Skip to main content
Print / Save
Privacy and Cookie Statement
Privacy Statement
5 Sept 2024
First things first – your privacy is important to us. That might be the kind of thing all these notices say, but we mean it. You place your trust in us by using Booking.com services and we value that trust. That means we’re committed to protecting and safeguarding your personal data. We act in our customers’ best interest and we are transparent about the processing of your personal data.
This document (‘this Privacy Statement’ or ‘our Privacy Statement’) describes how we use and process your personal data, provided in a readable and transparent manner. It also tells you what rights you can exercise in relation to your personal data and how you can contact us. Please also read our
Cookie Statement
, which tells you how Booking.com uses cookies and other similar tracking technologies.
If you’ve used us before, you know that Booking.com offers online travel-related services through our own websites and mobile apps, as well as other online platforms such as partners’ websites and social media. We’d like to point out that all the information you are about to read, generally applies to all of these platforms.
In fact, this single privacy statement applies to any kind of customer information we collect through all of the above platforms or by any other means connected to these platforms.
If you are one of our business partners, make sure to also check out our
Privacy Statement for Business Partners
to understand how personal data is further processed as part of the business relationship.
We might amend this Privacy Statement from time to time, so we recommend you visit this page occasionally to make sure you know where you stand. If we make any updates to this Privacy Statement that will impact you significantly, we’ll inform you about the changes before any new activities begin.
Terms we use in this Privacy Statement
'Trip' means the various different travel products and services that can be ordered, acquired, purchased, bought, paid, rented, provided, reserved, combined, or consummated by you from the Trip Provider.
'Trip Provider' means the provider of accommodation (e.g. hotel, motel, apartment, bed & breakfast, landlord), attractions (e.g. (theme) parks, museums, sightseeing tours), transportation provider (e.g. car rentals, cruises, rail, airport rides, coach tours, transfers), tour operators, travel insurances and any other travel or related product or service as from time to time available for Trip Reservation on the platform.
'Trip Service' means the online purchase, order, (facilitated) payment or reservation service as offered or enabled by Booking.com in respect of various products and services as from time to time made available by Trip Providers on the platform.
'Trip Reservation' means the order, purchase, payment, booking or reservation of a Trip.
What kind of personal data does Booking.com collect?
We can’t help you book the perfect Trip without information, so when you use our services there are certain things we ask for. This is typically routine information – your name, preferred contact details, the names of the people travelling with you and your payment information. You might also decide to submit additional information related to your upcoming Trip (for example, your anticipated arrival time).
In addition to this, we also collect information from the computer, phone, tablet or other device you use to access our services. This includes the IP address, the browser you’re using and your language settings. There are also situations in which we receive information about you from others or when we automatically collect other information.
This is the general overview but if you’d like to know more about the information we collect, we go into more detail below.
Read more about the personal data we collect
Why does Booking.com collect and use your personal data?
The main reason we ask you for personal details is to help you organise your online Trip Reservations and ensure you get the best service possible.
We also use your personal data to contact you about the latest deals, special offers and other products or services we think you might be interested in. There are other uses, too. If you’d like to find out what they are, read on for a more detailed explanation.
Read more about why Booking.com collects your data
How does Booking.com share your data with third parties?
There are different parties integrated into Booking.com’s services, in various ways and for various reasons. The primary reason we share your data is to supply the Trip Provider with the relevant information to complete your Trip Reservation.
We also involve other parties to provide you with the Booking.com services. This includes, for example, financial institutions, advertisers, subsidiaries of the Booking.com corporate group and the other companies that form the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group. Or, in some cases, if we’re required to by law, we might share your data with governmental or other authorities
Below, we go into more detail about how the information you share with us is used and exchanged with these parties.
Read more about how data is shared with third parties
How is your personal data shared within the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group?
Booking.com is part of the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group. Read on to find out more about how your data may be shared within the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group.
Read more about data within Booking Holdings Inc.
How is your personal data shared and further processed for ground transport services?
Booking.com and Rentalcars.com – also part of the Booking Holdings Inc. group of companies – jointly use your data to offer you ground transport services via the Booking.com websites and apps (such as
cars.booking.com
or
taxi.booking.com
). Read more to understand the scope and limited nature of our joint responsibility.
Read more about data and our ground transport services
How is your personal data shared and further processed for insurance services?
We work with different parties when offering insurance services. Follow the link below to understand how your data is used and shared for insurance purposes and learn about the responsibilities of the parties involved.
Read more about data and insurance products and services
How does Booking.com process communications that you and your Trip Provider may send via Booking.com?
Booking.com can help you and Trip Providers exchange information or requests about services and existing Trip Reservations, through the Booking.com platform. If you want to find out more about how Booking.com receives and handles these communications, read on here.
Read more about how these communications are processed
How does Booking.com make use of mobile devices?
We offer free apps, through which we also collect and process personal data. This works in much the same way as our website, but they also allow you to benefit from the location services available on your mobile device(s).
Read more about how we use data from mobile devices
How does Booking.com make use of social media?
The use of social media may be integrated into Booking.com services in various ways. These will involve us collecting some of your personal data or the social media provider receiving some of your information. We don’t use WhatsApp or similar third-party services to request booking or payment confirmations.
Read more about how we use social media data
How does Booking.com use artificial intelligence and make automated decisions?
Booking.com is always looking for opportunities to innovate and improve the services offered to you. In some cases, we may use new technologies such as Artificial Intelligence (AI) and decision automation systems.
Read more about how we use AI and make automated decisions
What security and retention procedures does Booking.com put in place to safeguard your personal data?
We have implemented a range of procedures to prevent unauthorised access to, and the misuse of, personal data that we process.
Read more about security and retention procedures
How does Booking.com treat personal data belonging to children?
Unless indicated otherwise, Booking.com is a service you are only allowed to use if you are over 18 years of age. We only process information about children with the consent of their parents or legal guardians, or when the information is shared with us by the parents or legal guardians themselves.
Read more about the personal data of under 18s
How can you control the personal data you’ve given to Booking.com?
Among others, you have the right to review the personal data we keep about you at any time and request access to or deletion of your personal data by submitting
this form
. If you want to find out more about your rights to control your personal data, read on.
Read more about how you can control your personal data
Who is responsible for the processing of personal data on the Booking.com website and apps?
Booking.com B.V., located in Amsterdam, The Netherlands, controls the processing of personal data for the provision of its services. That includes its websites and mobile apps, except for some exceptions that are clarified in this privacy statement.
Read more about Booking.com B.V.'s responsibility for personal data
Country-specific provisions
Depending on the law that applies to you, we may be required to provide some additional information. If applicable, you will find additional information for your country or region below.
Read more about country-specific provisions
What kind of personal data does Booking.com collect?
OK, so you’re looking for some more in-depth information. Here’s a closer look at what we collect.
Personal data you give to us.
Booking.com collects and uses information you provide to us. When you make a Trip Reservation, you are (at a minimum) asked for your name and email address.
Depending on the Trip Reservation, we may also ask for your home address, telephone number, payment information, date of birth, current location (in the case of on-demand services), the names of the people travelling with you and any preferences you might have for your Trip (such as dietary or accessibility requirements). In some cases you may also be able to check-in online with the Trip Provider, for which we will ask you to share passport information or a driving licence and signatures.
If you need to get in touch with our customer service team, contact your Trip Provider through us, or reach out to us in a different way (such as social media or via a chatbot) we’ll collect information from you there, too. This applies whether you are contacting us with feedback or asking for help using our services.
You might also be invited to write reviews to help inform others about the experiences you had on your Trip. When you write a review on the Booking.com platform, we’ll collect any information you’ve included, along with your first name and avatar (if you choose one).
There are other instances where you’ll provide us with information, as well. For example, if you’re browsing with your mobile device, you can decide to allow Booking.com to see your current location or grant us access to some contact details. This helps us to give you the best possible service and experience by, for example, showing you our city guides, suggesting the nearest restaurants or attractions to your location or making other recommendations.
If you create a user account, we’ll also store your personal settings, uploaded photos, and reviews of previous bookings there. This saved data can be used to help you plan and manage future Trip Reservations or personalised recommendations or benefit from other features only available to account holders (such as incentives or other benefits).
You can also choose to add details from your identification documents to your user accounts, so that you don’t have to submit this information for each individual Trip Reservation.
We may offer you referral programs or sweepstakes, and participating in these will mean providing us with relevant personal data.
Personal data you give us about others.
If you have a Booking.com for Business account, you can keep an address book there to make it easier to plan and manage business travel arrangements for others.
If you make a Trip Reservation for another person or people or together with others, you may share personal data about others in relation to the Trip Reservation.
In some cases, you might use Booking.com to share information with others. This can take the form of sharing a wishlist, or participating in a referral programme, as described when you use the relevant feature.
At this point, we have to make it clear that it’s your responsibility to ensure that the person or people you have provided personal data about are aware that you’ve done so, and that they can understand how Booking.com uses their information (as described in this Privacy Statement).
Personal data we collect automatically.
Whether or not you end up making a Trip Reservation, when you visit our websites or apps we automatically collect certain information. This includes your IP address, the date and time you accessed our services, and information about your computer’s hardware and software (such as the operating system, the internet browser used, software/application version data and your language settings). We also collect information about clicks and which pages have been shown to you, for instance via the cookies that we drop.
If you’re using a mobile device, we collect data that identifies the device, as well as data about your device-specific settings and characteristics, app crashes and other system activity. When you make a Trip Reservation using this kind of device, our system registers how you made your reservation (on which website), and/or which site you came from when you entered the Booking.com website or app.
Personal data we receive from other sources.
It’s not just the things you tell us, though – we may also receive information about you from other sources. These can include business partners, such as affiliate partners, subsidiaries of the Booking.com corporate group, other companies in the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group and other independent third parties.
Information we receive from these partners may be used together with other information provided by you. For example, Booking.com Trip Reservation services are not only made available via Booking.com and the Booking.com apps but are also integrated into services of affiliate partners you can find online. When you use any of these services, we may receive data about your Trip Reservation from our affiliate partners.
We also integrate with third-party service providers to facilitate payments between you and Trip Providers. These service providers share payment information so we can administer and handle your Trip Reservation.
Additionally, we collect information in the regrettable case that we receive a complaint about you from a Trip Provider, for example in the case of misconduct. In case of concerns about integrity and/or safety incidents against our guests, our partners or Booking.com, Booking.com collects information from publicly available sources to prevent or detect harm. We cannot prevent that some of that information may contain special categories of personal data.
Another way we might receive data about you, is through the communication services integrated into our platforms. These communication services offer you a way to contact theTrip Provider you’ve booked with to discuss your stay. In some cases, we receive metadata about these communication activities (such as who you are, where you called from, and the date and length of the call).
We may also receive information about you in order to show you more relevant ads, such as the additional cookie data Booking.com social media partners make available to us. Please read the section
Why does Booking.com collect and use your personal data?
for more information.
When you link your Booking.com user account to your social media account, you might trigger exchanges of data between Booking.com and that social media provider. You can always choose not to share that data.
Trip Providers may share information about you with Booking.com, too. This could happen if you have support questions about a pending Trip Reservation, or if disputes or other issues arise about a Trip Reservation.
Why does Booking.com collect and use your personal data?
We use the information collected about you for a variety of purposes. Your personal data may be used in the following ways:
Trip Reservations: First and foremost, we use your personal data to complete and administer your online Trip Reservation – which is essential for us to provide this service for you. This includes sending you communications that relate to your Trip Reservation, such as confirmations (including, where applicable, providing you with a proof of purchase and/or payment), modifications and reminders. In some cases, this may also include processing your personal data to enable online check-in with the Trip Provider or processing personal data in relation to possible damage deposits.
Customer service: We provide international customer service from our local offices in more than 20 languages, and we’re here to help 24 hours a day, 7 days a week. Sharing relevant details, such as reservation information or information about your user account with our global customer service staff allows us to respond when you need us. This includes helping you to contact the right Trip Provider and responding to any questions you might have about your Trip Reservation (or any other queries, for that matter).
Account facilities: Booking.com users can create an account on our website or apps. We use the information you give us to administer this account, allowing you to do a number of useful things. You can manage your Trip Reservations, take advantage of special offers, make future Trip Reservations easily and manage your personal settings.
Managing personal settings gives you the ability to keep and share lists, share photos, easily see Trip Services you’ve searched for and check travel-related information you’ve provided. You can also see any reviews you’ve written.
If you want to, you can share certain information as part of your user account, by creating a public profile under your own first name or a screen name you choose. If you are logged in to your account and you want to create a Business account, we may use your name and email address to pre-fill the sign up form.
If you’re a Booking.com for Business account holder, you can also save contact details under that account, manage business reservations and link other account holders to the same Booking.com for Business account.
Online groups: We may give account holders the chance to connect and interact with each other through online groups or forums.
Marketing activities: We use your contact information, reservation details, account information, browsing data, location data and preferences for marketing activities. These activities include:
Using your contact information and (collected via cookies and similar tracking technologies) your interaction with the Booking.com platform to send you personalised marketing messages (for example via push notifications or email) from Booking.com, including promotions, search assistant messages, Genius and other rewards, travel experiences, surveys and updates about Booking.com’s products and services. You can unsubscribe from receiving email marketing communications quickly, easily and at any time. All you need to do is click on the ‘Unsubscribe’ link included in each newsletter or other communication, or manage your preferences via your account settings.
Based on your interaction on the Booking.com platform (collected via cookies and similar tracking technologies), personalised marketing from Booking.com including promotions, search assistant messages, Genius and other rewards, travel experiences, surveys and updates about Booking.com’s products and services might be shown to you on or about the Booking.com website, on mobile apps, or on third-party websites/apps (including social media sites), and the content of the site displayed to you might be personalised. These could be offers and recommendations we think you might find interesting that you can book directly on the Booking.com platform, on co-branded sites, or on other third-party sites. Some of these recommendations may be produced on the basis of personal data we collected from you during different visits to our platform and/or on different devices, even when you are not logged in. Our
How we work
page contains more information on our Ranking and Recommender systems, including how you can manage your personalisation preferences.
When you participate in other promotional activities (such as sweepstakes, referral programmes or competitions), only relevant information will be used to administer these promotions.
Communicating with you: There might be times when we get in touch, including by email, by push notification, by chatbot, by post, by phone, or by text and/or process communications you send to us.
There could be a number of reasons for this, including:
Responding to and handling any requests you or your booked Trip Provider have made. Booking.com also offers customers and Trip Providers various ways to exchange information, requests and comments about Trip Providers and existing Trip Reservations via Booking.com. For more information, read the section titled
‘How does Booking.com process communications that you and your Trip Provider send through Booking.com?’
.
If you have started but not finished a Trip search or Reservation online, we might contact you to invite you to continue with your search or reservation. We believe that this additional service benefits you as it allows you to pick up the process where you left off without having to search for a Trip Provider or fill in your reservation details again.
When you use our products and services, we might send you a questionnaire or invite you to provide a review about your experience with Booking.com or the Trip Provider.
We also send you other material related to your Trip Reservations, such as how to contact Booking.com if you need assistance while you’re away, and information that we feel might be useful to you in planning or getting the best out of your Trip. We might also send you material related to upcoming Trip Reservations or a summary of previous Trip Reservations you made through Booking.com.
Even if you don’t have an upcoming Trip Reservation, we may still need to send you administrative messages, which could include security alerts.
In case of misconduct, we may send you a notice and/or warning.
Market research: We sometimes invite our customers to take part in market research. Please see the information that accompanies this kind of invitation to understand what personal data will be collected and how that data is used.
Improving our services: We use personal data for analytical purposes and product improvement, such as offering a more personalised experience based on how you or customers like you with similar interests use our platform for booking your chosen accommodation with us. Further, we may process your user ID, which is linked to the email address used to create your account, for the purpose of measuring the audience visiting our websites. Also your personal data may also be used for the development and enhancement of our machine-learning models and artificial intelligence tools. This is part of our commitment to making our services better and enhancing the user experience.
In this case, we use data for testing and troubleshooting purposes, as well as to generate statistics about our business. The main goal here is to get insights into how our services perform, how they are used, and ultimately to optimise and customise our website and apps, making them easier and more meaningful to use. As much as possible, we strive to use anonymised and de-identified personal data for this analytical work.
In order to achieve this purpose, we may combine personal data we collect from you during different visits to our platform or visits on different devices, even when you are not logged in.
Providing the best price applicable to you, depending on where you are based: When you search our apps or website, for example to find an accommodation, a rental car or a flight, we process your IP address to confirm whether you are in the European Economic Area (EEA) or in another country. We do this to offer you the best price for the region (EEA) or country (non-EEA) where you are based.
Customer reviews and other destination-related information: During and after your Trip, we might invite you to submit a review. We can also make it possible for the people you’re travelling with or whom you’ve booked a reservation for to do this instead. This invite asks for information about the Trip Provider or the destination.
If you have a Booking.com account, you can choose to display a screen name next to your review, instead of your real name. If you’d like to set a screen name, you can do that in your account settings. Adding an avatar is also possible.
By completing a review, you’re agreeing that it can be displayed (as described in detail in our
Terms and Conditions
) on, for example, the relevant Trip Provider information page on our websites, on our mobile apps, on our social media accounts and social media apps, or on the online platform of the relevant Trip Provider or business partner’s website. This is to inform other travellers about the quality of the Trip Service you used, the destination you have chosen or any other experiences you choose to share.
Call monitoring: When you make calls to our customer service team, Booking.com uses an automated telephone number detection system to match your telephone number to your existing reservations. This can help save time for both you and our customer service staff. However, our customer service staff may still ask for authentication, which helps to keep your reservation details confidential.
During calls with our customer service team, live listening might be carried out or calls might be recorded for quality control and training purposes. This includes the usage of the recordings for the handling of complaints, legal claims and for fraud detection.
We do not record all calls. In the case that a call is recorded, each recording is kept for a limited amount of time before being automatically deleted. This is unless we have determined that it’s necessary to keep the recording for fraud investigation or legal purposes. You can read more about this below.
Promotion of a safe and trustworthy service: To create a trustworthy environment for you, the people you bring with you on your Trip, Booking.com’s business partners, our Trip Providers and Booking.com, we continuously analyse and use certain personal data to detect and prevent fraud and other illegal or unwanted activities. In the unlikely event of concerns about integrity and/or safety incidents, we consult publicly available information, during this we cannot prevent that some of that information may include special categories of personal data.
Similarly, we use personal data for risk assessment and security purposes, including when you report a safety concern, for the authentication of users and reservations, or when others report a fraud or safety incident about you. When we do this we may have to stop or put certain Trip Reservations on hold until we’ve finished our assessment. For the purposes of detecting and preventing fraud and harm, and protecting our guests, business partners, Trip Providers and Booking.com, we may use your contact information, reservation details, reviews, account information, browsing data, location data, communications data, or other information that you or another person has provided to Booking.com. If we have concerns about serious misconduct, we may decide to cancel your upcoming reservations or to decline future reservations via our platform.
Legal purposes: In certain cases, we may need to use your information to handle and resolve legal claims and disputes, for regulatory investigations and compliance, to enforce the Booking.com online reservation service terms of use or to comply with lawful requests from law enforcement.
Providing your personal data to Booking.com is voluntary. However, we may only be able to provide you with certain services if we can collect some personal data. For instance, we can’t process your Trip Reservation if we don’t collect your name and contact details.
To process your personal data as described above, we rely on the following legal bases:
As applicable, for purpose A and B, Booking.com relies on the legal basis that the processing of personal data is necessary for the performance of a contract, specifically to finalise and administer your Trip Reservation.
If the required personal data is not provided, Booking.com cannot finalise the Trip Reservation, nor can we provide customer service. In view of purposes C to L, Booking.com relies on its (or third parties’) legitimate interest, to provide and improve services and to prevent fraud and other illegal acts (as set out more specifically under C to L). Moreover, in the unlikely event Booking.com would process special categories of personal data in the context of purpose L, Booking.com relies, where applicable, on the fact that processing relates to personal data which are manifestly made public by the data subject.
When using personal data to serve Booking.com’s or a third party's legitimate interest, Booking.com will always balance your rights and interests in the protection of your personal data against Booking.com’s rights and interests or those of the third party. For purposes M, Booking.com also relies, where applicable, on compliance with legal obligations (such as lawful law enforcement requests).
Where needed under applicable law, Booking.com will obtain your consent (or as otherwise required by law) prior to processing your personal data, including for cookies and similar tracking technologies and marketing messaging purposes.
We may use your personal data to develop and train artificial intelligence models and/or systems (AI) where the purpose of collecting your data is to provide or improve our services to you. The legal bases for using AI which we rely on are:
Beyond preventing and detecting fraud attempts, we may have a legitimate interest in developing AI to improve the efficiency and quality of our products and services. We always consider whether your rights and freedoms are infringed and will only proceed where this legitimate interest is not overridden by your rights.
In other cases where we may use AI, we will seek your consent where this is required.
If you wish to object to the processing set out under C to L or, where applicable, to the use of your personal data in the context of AI and no opt-out mechanism is available to you directly (for example, in marketing emails or your account settings), please contact us at
dataprotectionoffice@booking.com
or go to the
form
.
How does Booking.com share your data with third parties?
In certain circumstances, we’ll share your personal data with third parties. These third parties include:
The Trip Provider you booked: In order to complete your Trip Reservation, we transfer relevant reservation details to the Trip Provider you have booked. This is one of the most essential things we do for you.
Depending on the Trip Reservation and the Trip Provider, the details we share can include your name, contact and payment details, the names of the people accompanying you and any other information or preferences you specified when you made your Trip Reservation.
In certain cases, we also provide some additional historical information about you to the Trip Provider. This includes whether you’ve already booked with them in the past, the number of completed bookings you’ve made with Booking.com, a confirmation that no misconduct has been reported about you, the percentage of bookings you’ve cancelled in the past or whether you’ve given reviews about past bookings.
If you have a query about your Trip, we may contact the Trip Provider to handle your request. Unless payment is made during the booking process, via the Booking.com website, we will forward your credit card details to the booked Trip Provider for further handling (assuming you’ve provided us with those details).
In cases of Trip Reservation-related claims or disputes, we may provide the Trip Provider with your contact details and other information about the booking process, as needed to resolve the situation. This can include, but might not be limited to, your email address and a copy of your reservation confirmation as proof that a Trip Reservation was made or to confirm reasons for cancellation.
For completeness, Trip Providers will further process your personal data outside of the control of Booking.com. Trip Providers may also ask for additional personal data, for instance to provide additional services, or to comply with local restrictions. If available, please read the Privacy Statement of the Trip Provider to understand how they process your personal data.
Connectivity Providers: Please note that certain Trip Providers may need us to share your personal data with a contracted Connectivity Provider in order to be able to finalise and administer your reservation. Connectivity providers act on behalf of Trip Providers and help them to manage their reservations.
Your local Booking.com office: To support the use of Booking.com services, your details may be shared with subsidiaries of the Booking.com corporate group, including for customer service. To find out more about the Booking.com corporate group, visit
About Booking.com
.
Third-party service providers: We use service providers from outside of the Booking.com corporate group to support us in providing our services. These include:
Customer support
Market research
Fraud detection and prevention (including anti-fraud screening)
Insurance claims
Payment
We use third parties to process payments, handle chargebacks or provide billing collection services. When a chargeback is requested for your Trip Reservation, either by you or by the holder of the credit card used to make your reservation, we need to share certain reservation details with the payment service provider and the relevant financial institution so they can handle the chargeback. This may also include a copy of your reservation confirmation or the IP address used to make your reservation. We may share information with relevant financial institutions, if we consider it strictly necessary for fraud detection and prevention purposes.
When a chargeback is requested for your Trip Reservation, either by you or by the holder of the credit card used to make your reservation, we need to share certain reservation details with the payment service provider and the relevant financial institution so they can handle the chargeback. This may also include a copy of your reservation confirmation or the IP address used to make your reservation.
We may also share information with relevant financial institutions, if we consider it strictly necessary for fraud detection and prevention purposes.
Marketing services
We share personal data with advertising partners, including your email address, IP address and telephone number, as part of marketing Booking.com services via third parties (to ensure that relevant advertisements are shown to the right audience). We use techniques such as hashing to enable the matching of your email address, IP address and/or telephone number with an existing customer database, to prevent this data from being used for other purposes. For information on other personalised advertisements and your choices, please read our
Cookie Statement
.
Advertising partners
We use advertising partners, such as metasearch providers, to allow you to compare our offers with offers from other Online Travel Agencies (OTAs).  When you make a reservation on Booking.com after using an advertising partner, we will send the details of the reservation that you made on Booking.com to that partner.
Other professional third parties: In certain cases (such as disputes or legal claims or as part of auditing activities), we may need to share your personal data with professional advisors. These advisors include parties such as law firms or auditors. We only share your personal data to the extent that is necessary and such third parties process this data in line with their own professional obligations.
Competent authorities: We disclose personal data to law enforcement to the extent that it is required by law or is strictly necessary for the prevention, detection or prosecution of criminal acts and fraud. We may need to further disclose relevant personal data to competent authorities (including tax authorities and municipalities) to comply with a legal obligation (for instance, under short-term rental laws), to protect and defend our rights, or the rights and properties of our business partners.
Business partners: We work with many business partners around the world. These business partners distribute and advertise Booking.com services, including the services and products of our Trip Providers.
When you make a reservation on one of our business partners’ websites or apps, certain personal data that you give them, such as your name and email address, your address, payment details and other relevant information, may be forwarded to us to finalise and manage your Trip Reservation.
If customer service is provided by the business partner, Booking.com will share relevant reservation details with them (as and when needed) in order to provide you with appropriate and efficient support.
When you make a reservation through one of our business partners’ websites, the business partners can receive certain parts of your personal data related to the specific reservation and your interactions on these partner websites. This is for their commercial purposes.
When you make a reservation on a business partners’ website, please also take the time to read their privacy notice if you’d like to understand how they process your personal data. With these business partners we may act as joint controllers. If you choose to exercise your data subject rights with our business partners, we may collaborate to ensure an adequate response to your request.
For fraud detection and prevention purposes, we may also exchange information about our users with business partners – but only when strictly necessary.
If an insurance claim is made, concerning you and a Trip Provider, we may provide the necessary data (including personal data) to the insurance company for further processing.
Partner Offer: We may present you with a ‘Partner Offer’. When you book a stay marked ‘Partner Offer’, your reservation will be facilitated by a Trip Provider who is separate from the accommodation you’re booking. As part of the reservation process, we’ll need to share some relevant personal data with this business partner.
If you book a Partner Offer, please review the information provided in the booking process or check your reservation confirmation for more information about the Trip Provider and how they will further process your personal data.
The Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group: Read about
how we share your personal data with the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group
.
Booking.com is a global business. The data that we collect from you, as described in this Privacy Statement, could be made accessible from, transferred to or stored in countries which may not have the same data protection laws as the country in which you initially provided the information. In such cases, we will protect your data as described in this Privacy Statement.
This may also be applicable if you are in the European Economic Area (EEA). Countries your data may be transferred to may not have laws that provide the same level of protection for your personal data as laws within the EEA. Where this is the case, we will put appropriate safeguards in place to make sure that these transfers comply with relevant European regulations.
In particular, when your data is transferred to third-party service providers, we establish and implement appropriate contractual, organisational and technical measures with them. This is done by putting in place Standard Contractual Clauses as approved by the European Commission, by examining the countries to which the data may be transferred, and by imposing specific technical and organisational security measures.
In certain specific cases, we transfer your data outside the EEA because it is in your interest or is necessary to conclude or perform the contract we have with you. For instance, when you make a reservation on Booking.com or through a business partner, we might need to transfer your data to a Trip Provider or business partner who is located outside the EEA.
You can ask us to see a copy of our implemented safeguards (where possible) by contacting us at
dataprotectionoffice@booking.com
.
How is your personal data shared within the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group?
Booking.com is part of the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group. More information is available at
Bookingholdings.com
.
We may receive personal data about you from other companies in the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group, or share your personal data with them, for the following purposes:
To provide services (including to make, administer and manage reservations or handle payments)
To provide customer service
To detect, prevent and investigate fraudulent, other illegal activities and data breaches
For analytical and product improvement purposes where permitted by applicable law;
To provide personalised offers or send you marketing with your consent or as otherwise permitted by applicable law
For hosting, technical support, overall maintenance and maintaining security of such shared data
To ensure compliance with applicable laws
As applicable and unless indicated otherwise, for purposes A to F, Booking.com relies on its legitimate interests to share and receive personal data. For purpose G, Booking.com relies, where applicable, on compliance with legal obligations (such as lawful law enforcement requests). In the EEA, Booking also ensures that data flows between companies in the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group comply with relevant European regulations such as the Digital Markets Act.
For example, Booking.com works closely with Rentalcars.com to offer ground transport services to customers. Please read
How is your personal data shared and further processed for ground transport services?
for more information.
All companies within the Booking Holdings Inc. group of companies may need to exchange personal customer data to ensure all users are protected from fraudulent activities on its online platforms.
How is your personal data shared and further processed for ground transport services?
Booking.com Transport Limited, trading as Rentalcars.com, is a private limited liability company, incorporated under the laws of the United Kingdom with offices at 6 Goods Yard Street, Manchester, M3 3BG, United Kingdom.
Booking.com and Rentalcars.com (both part of the Booking Holdings Inc. group of companies) work together closely to offer you ground transport services via Booking.com websites and apps, such as cars.booking.com or taxi.booking.com.
The ground transportation services offered by Booking.com websites and apps are operated by Rentalcars.com, under the Booking.com brand. This means that when you're booking or browsing for ground transport services via the app or website, Booking.com and Rentalcars.com are collectively responsible for the collection and use of your personal data.
In addition to the data we process to allow you to search for ground transport services and make your booking, Booking.com and Rentalcars.com can also use your personal data independently. This is in line with the purposes set out in this Privacy Statement and the Rentalcars.com Privacy Notice.
For further information about the relationship between Booking.com and Rentalcars.com, and to exercise your rights regarding your personal data that is collected via the Booking.com websites and apps, please feel free to contact Booking.com at any time. You can do this via the email address under
'Who is responsible for the processing of personal data via Booking.com and how to contact us?
'.
How is your personal data shared and further processed for insurance services?
Booking.com Distribution B.V. is a sister company of Booking.com with registered offices at Oosterdokskade 163, 1011 DL, Amsterdam, The Netherlands. Booking.com and Booking.com Distribution B.V. work closely together to offer customers different insurance products and services for Trip Reservations, for example room cancellation insurance.
The offering of insurance can involve multiple parties, such as intermediaries, underwriters, and other agents. Where Booking.com Distribution B.V. is involved, it will act as the intermediary and authorised agent or appointed representative (depending on the jurisdiction) on behalf of the insurer, by offering insurance products and services to Booking.com customers.
Please review the information provided during the booking process for more information about Booking.com Distribution B.V and the parties who work together with Booking.com to offer you these products and services. The details of the insurer will be visible in the insurance policy and related documentation provided to you.
When offering insurance, Booking.com and Booking.com Distribution B.V. may have to use and share personal data that is relevant to the insurance product. This data relates to you as a potential or actual policyholder, the beneficiaries under a policy, family members, claimants and other parties involved in a claim:
To provide offers, arrange insurance cover and handle insurance claims, some personal data, provided to us during the booking process, (‘General Order Data’) may have to be shared with Booking.com Distribution B.V.. You may also be asked to provide additional information, such as names of family members or other beneficiaries or details about a claim (‘Insurance-Specific Data’).
If you make a claim under an insurance policy, this claim may be directly handled by the insurer. This means that you may be asked to provide personal data in order to submit the claim directly to them. The insurer will inform you accordingly at the point of collection of your information. When your claim is handled by the insurer, Booking.com may receive information about the status of your claim in order to provide you with customer support services.
When Booking.com Distribution B.V. acts as an intermediary for insurance products and services via Booking.com, the two companies are jointly responsible for the collection of Insurance-Specific Data and its transmission from Booking.com to Booking.com Distribution B.V. However, Booking.com Distribution B.V. acts as the sole controller for any processing outside of the Booking.com B.V. systems. Any personal data collected by Booking.com for insurance purposes will be processed as set out in this Privacy Statement.
For further information about the relationship between Booking.com and Booking.com Distribution B.V., and to exercise your rights regarding personal data that is collected via the Booking.com website and apps,
please contact us
.
How does Booking.com process communications that you and your booked Trip Provider may send via Booking.com?
Booking.com can offer you and Trip Providers various ways to communicate about the Trip Services and existing Trip Reservations, directing the communications via Booking.com. This also allows you and your Trip Provider to contact Booking.com with questions about your Trip Reservation through the website, our apps and the other channels that we make available.
Booking.com accesses communications and may use automated systems to review, scan, and analyse communications for the following reasons:
Security purposes
Fraud prevention
Compliance with legal and regulatory requirements
Investigations of potential misconduct
Product development and improvement
Research
Customer engagement (including to provide you with information and offers that we believe may be of interest to you)
Customer or technical support
We reserve the right to review or block the delivery of communications that we, in our sole discretion, believe might contain malicious content or spam, or pose a risk to you, Trip Providers, Booking.com or others.
All communications sent or received using Booking.com communication tools will be received and stored by Booking.com. Trip Providers and Business partners you’ve booked a Trip Reservation through might also choose to communicate with you directly by email or through other channels that Booking.com does not control.
How does Booking.com make use of mobile devices?
We offer free apps for a range of different mobile devices, as well as versions of our regular website that have been optimised for browsing on a mobile and tablet.
These apps and mobile websites process the personal details you give us in much the same way as our website does. They also allow you to use location services to find Trip Services nearby, if you want to.
With your consent, we may send you push notifications with information about your Trip Reservation. You can also choose to grant us access to your location data or contact details in order to provide services you’ve requested. If you upload pictures to our platform, these pictures may include location information (known as metadata) as well. Please read your mobile device’s instructions to understand how to change your settings and control the sharing of this category of data.
When you choose to use our ‘Voice Assistant’ to search our services or manage your bookings, your speech will be anonymously translated into text by a third-party service provider. You will need to give us access to your device's microphone to use this feature.
In order to optimise our services and marketing activities, and to make sure we give you a consistent user experience, we use something known as ‘cross-device tracking’. This can be done with or without the use of cookies. For more general information about cookies and other similar technologies, please see our
Cookie statement
.
With cross-device tracking, Booking.com is able to track user activity across multiple devices. As part of cross-device tracking, we may combine data collected from a particular browser or mobile device with data from another computer or device used by the same customer.
In order to optimise the content of the Booking.com newsletter, we combine searches and reservations made from different computers and devices. You can unsubscribe from the Booking.com newsletter at any time.
Personalised ads shown to you on other websites or in apps, can be offered based on your activities on linked computers and devices. By changing the cookie settings on your device (see our
Cookie statement
under ‘What are your choices?’), you can change your cross-device tracking settings for advertisement purposes. You should know that logging out of your Booking.com account doesn’t mean that you will no longer receive personalised ads.
How does Booking.com make use of social media?
At Booking.com, we use social media in different ways. We use it to facilitate the use of online reservation services, but also to promote our Trip Providers’ travel-related products and services and to advertise, improve and facilitate our own services.
Note that the use of social media features can result in the exchange of personal data between Booking.com and the social media service provider, as we describe below. You are free not to use any of the social media features available to you.
Sign in with your social media account. We offer you the opportunity to sign in to a Booking.com user account with one of your social media accounts. We do this to reduce the need for you to remember different usernames and passwords for different online services.
After you’ve signed in once, you’ll be able to use your social media account to sign into your Booking.com account. You can decouple your Booking.com user account from your chosen social media account any time you want to.
Integration of social media plugins. We have also integrated social media plugins into the Booking.com website and apps. This means that when you click or tap on one of the buttons (such as Facebook’s ‘Like’ button), certain information is shared with these social media providers.
If you’re logged into your social media account when you click or tap one of these buttons, your social media provider may relate this information to your social media account. Depending on your settings, they might also display these actions on your social media profile, to be seen by others in your network.
Other social media services and features. We may integrate other social media services (like social media messaging) for you to interact with Booking.com or with your contacts about our services.
We may maintain social media accounts and offer apps on several social media sites. Whenever you connect with Booking.com through social media, your social media service provider may allow you to share information with us.
If you choose to share, your social media provider will generally inform you about which information will be shared. For example, when you sign into a Booking.com user account using your social media account, certain information from that account may be shared with Booking.com. This includes your email address, your age and the profile pictures you’ve saved – depending on what you authorise in your social media account.
When you register with a Booking.com social media app or connect to a social media messaging service without a Booking.com user account, the information you choose to share with us may include the basic information available in your social media profile (including your email address, status updates and a list of your contacts).
We’ll use this information to help provide you with the service you requested – for example, to forward a message you want to send to your contacts or to create a personalised user experience in the app or on our websites. It means that if you want us to, we can tailor our services to suit your needs, connecting you and your friends with the best travel destinations and analysing and improving our travel-related services.  Please note that we don’t use WhatsApp or similar third-party services to request booking or payment confirmations. If you receive, for example, a WhatsApp message asking you to follow a link to guarantee your booking or complete a related payment, do not reply to this message or follow that link. Instead, we ask that you report the message to our
Customer Service
team.
Your social media provider will be able to tell you more about how they use and process your data when you connect to Booking.com through them. This can include combining the personal data they collect when you use Booking.com through them with information they collect when you use other online platforms you have also linked to your social media account.
If you decide to connect using your Facebook or Google account, please review the following links for information about how these parties use data they receive:
Facebook
and
Google
.
How we use artificial intelligence and make automated decisions
We are always looking for opportunities to innovate and improve the customer experience by using new technologies such as AI. We currently use AI for the following purposes:
Promotion of a safe and trustworthy service and prevention of fraud.
Showing you the most relevant content. We use AI to improve the customer experience and personalization on our platforms (such as providing you with summarised reviews). This may include sending you details of a trip we think you would be interested in (where you have consented to this communication) and ranking search results to put the best matches at the top of your feed.
Our
How we work
page contains more information on our recommendation systems, including on how you can manage your personalisation preferences.
Improving our services. We use AI to improve trip services in accordance with the details set out in the section
Why does Booking.com collect and use your personal data?
This includes the identification of trends, monitoring the operations of the platform, troubleshooting our websites and apps as well as improving the services we offer to you.
Developing AI interactive chats to allow you to ask questions about a trip or service and receive AI-generated relevant responses or itinerary suggestions.
Improving the effectiveness of the other purposes set out in this privacy statement.
We assess our AI against data protection principles, such as minimisation, accuracy, and purpose limitation. We take steps to prevent data inaccuracies, harm and biases from our use of AI.
See the section titled
What security and retention procedures does Booking.com put in place to safeguard your personal data?
for more information regarding the safeguards we have implemented which will also apply to personal data we process to train or use AI.
In most cases, the use of AI will not result in an automated decision being made about you. When we provide you with a trip recommendation using AI, this is only a suggestion, and you have control over how this is used.
We do not currently use any solely automated systems to make a decision about you which would result in a legal or similarly significant effect on you. We will inform you if this changes and will ensure that we have implemented suitable measures to safeguard your rights and freedoms. Sometimes, AI will contribute to a decision we make. AI that is used to inform or monitor the platform, for example for fraud attempts, will not autonomously make any decision that will have a significant impact on you. Where an AI identifies a possible issue a member of our team will complete the review and make an informed decision. In limited cases, we may complete decision-making without human review after we have assessed that the decision would not result in a significant effect on you.
If you would like to know more about our use of AI, contact us as described in the section
How can you control the personal data you’ve given to Booking.com?
What security and retention procedures does Booking.com put in place to safeguard your personal data?
We have procedures in place to prevent unauthorised access to, and the misuse of, personal data.
We use appropriate business systems and procedures to protect and safeguard your personal data. We also use security procedures and technical and physical restrictions for accessing and using the personal data on our servers. Only authorised personnel are permitted to access personal data in the course of their work.
We’ll keep your personal data for as long as is necessary to enable you to use our services or to provide our services to you (including maintaining any Booking.com user accounts you may have), to comply with applicable laws, resolve any disputes and otherwise to allow us to conduct our business, including to detect and prevent fraud and/or other illegal activities. All personal data we keep about you as a Booking.com customer is covered by this Privacy Statement.
For added protection, we strongly recommend that you set up two-factor authentication for your Booking.com user account. This adds an extra authentication step, to make sure that anyone who gets hold of your username and password (e.g. through phishing or social engineering) won’t be able to get into your account. You can set this up in the Security section of your account settings.
How does Booking.com treat personal data belonging to children?
Our services aren’t intended for children under 18 years old, and we’ll never collect their data unless it’s provided by (and with the consent of) a parent or guardian. The limited circumstances we might need to collect the personal data of children under 18 years old include part of a reservation, the purchase of other travel-related services, or other exceptional circumstances (such as features addressed to families). Again, this will only be used and collected as provided by a parent or guardian and with their consent.
If we become aware that we’ve processed the information of a child under 18 years old without the valid consent of a parent or guardian, we will delete it.
How can you control the personal data you’ve given to Booking.com?
We want you to be in control of how your personal data is used by us. You can do this in the following ways:
We want you to be in control of how your personal data is used by us. You can do this in the following ways:
You can ask us for a copy of the personal data we hold about you,
You can inform us of any changes to your personal data, or you can ask us to correct any of the personal data we hold about you. As explained below, you can make some of these changes yourself, online, when you have a user account,
In certain situations, you can ask us to erase, block, or restrict the processing of the personal data we hold about you, or object to particular ways in which we are using your personal data,
In certain situations, you can also ask us to send the personal data you have given us to a third party,
Where we are using your personal data on the basis of your consent, you are entitled to withdraw that consent at any time subject to applicable law, and
Where we process your personal data based on legitimate interest or the public interest, you have the right to object to that use of your personal data at any time, subject to applicable law.
We rely on you to make sure that your personal information is complete, accurate and current. Please do let us know about any changes to, or inaccuracies in, your personal information as soon as possible.
If you have a Booking.com user account, you can access a lot of your personal data through our website or apps. You’ll generally find the option to add, update or remove information we have about you in your account settings.
Users with a Booking.com account can also request that we delete your account through the Booking.com app. Note that app features can vary between operating systems and their third-party software providers.
If any of the personal data we have about you isn’t accessible through our website or apps, you can send us a request.
If you want to exercise your right of access or erasure, all you need to do is complete and submit the
Data Subject Request for Booking.com Customers
form. For any requests relating to this Privacy Statement, to exercise any of your other rights, or if you have a complaint, please contact our Data Protection Officer at
dataprotectionoffice@booking.com
. You can also contact your local data protection authority.
If you’d like to object to your personal data being processed on the basis of legitimate interest and there’s no way to opt out directly, please contact us at
dataprotectionoffice@booking.com
.
If you’d like to contact us by post, please address it to the Data Protection Officer and use the following postal address: Oosterdokskade 163, 1011 DL, Amsterdam, Netherlands.
Who is responsible for the processing of personal data via Booking.com and how to contact us?
Booking.com B.V. controls the processing of personal data, as described in this Privacy Statement, except where explicitly stated otherwise. Booking.com B.V. is a private limited liability company, incorporated under the laws of the Netherlands and has its offices at Oosterdokskade 163, 1011 DL Amsterdam, Netherlands.
If you have any questions about this Privacy Statement, or about our processing of your personal data, please contact our Data Protection Officer at dataprotectionoffice@booking.com and we’ll get back to you as soon as possible.  If you have any questions related to your reservation or you need customer service support, please follow this
link
.
For questions about a reservation, please contact our customer service team through the
customer service contact page
.
Requests from law enforcement should be submitted using the
Law Enforcement
process.
Country-specific provisions
Depending on the law that applies to you, we may be required to provide some additional information. If applicable, you will find additional information for your country or region below.
https://www.bravofly.com/en/info/privacy/bravonext.html
Cookie statement
Whenever you use our online services or apps, we use cookies and other online tracking technologies (which we’ll also refer to as 'cookies' for the purpose of this Cookie Statement).
Cookies can be used in various ways, including to make the Booking.com website work, to analyse traffic, or for advertising purposes.
Read on below to learn more about what a ‘cookie’ is, how they’re used and what your choices are.
What are cookies and other online tracking technologies?
How are cookies used?
What are your choices?
What are cookies and online tracking technologies?
A web browser cookie is a small text file that websites place on your computer’s or mobile device’s web browser.
These cookies store information about the content you view and interact with, in order to remember your preferences and settings or analyse how you use online services.
Cookies are divided into ‘first party’ and ‘third party’:
First party cookies
are the cookies served by the owner of the domain – in our case that’s Booking.com. Any cookie we place ourselves is a ‘first party cookie’.
Third party cookies
are cookies placed on our domains by trusted partners that we’ve chosen to allow to do so. These can be social media partners, advertising partners, security providers and more.
And they can be either ‘session cookies’ or ‘permanent cookies’:
Session cookies
only exist until you close your browser, ending what is called your ‘session’. They are then deleted.
Permanent cookies
have a range of different lifespans and stay on your device after the browser is closed. On the Booking.com platform, we try to only serve permanent cookies (or allow permanent cookies to be served by third parties) that have a limited lifespan. However, for security reasons, or in other exceptional circumstances, we might sometimes need to give a cookie a longer lifespan.
Web browser cookies may store information such as your IP address or another identifier, your browser type, and information about the content you view and interact with on digital services. By storing this information, web browser cookies can remember your preferences and settings for online services and analyse how you use them.
Alongside cookies, we also use tracking technologies that are very similar. Our website, emails and mobile apps may contain small transparent image files or lines of code that record how you interact with them. These include ‘web beacons’, ‘scripts’, ‘tracking URLs’ or ‘software development kits’ (known as SDKs):
Web beacons
have a lot of different names. They might also be known as web bugs, tracking bugs, tags, web tags, page tags, tracking pixels, pixel tags, 1x1 GIFs or clear GIFs.
In short, these beacons are a tiny graphic image of just one pixel that can be delivered to your device as part of a web page request, in an app, an advertisement or an HTML email message.
They can be used to retrieve information from your device, such as your device type or operating system, your IP address, and the time of your visit. They are also used to serve and read cookies in your browser or to trigger the placement of a cookie.
Scripts
are small computer programs embedded within our web pages that give those pages a wide variety of extra functionality. Scripts make it possible for the website to function properly. For example, scripts power certain security features and enable basic interactive features on our website.
Scripts can also be used for analytical or advertising purposes. For example, a script can collect information about how you use our website, such as which pages you visit or what you search for.
Tracking URLs
are links with a unique identifier in them. These are used to track which website brought you to the Booking.com website or app you’re using. An example would be if you click through from a social media page, search engine or one of our affiliate partners’ websites.
Software Development Kits (SDKs)
are part of our apps’ source code and unlike browser cookies, SDK data is stored in the app storage.
They’re used to analyse how the apps are being used or to send personalised push notifications. To do this, they record unique identifiers associated with your device, like device ID and IP address, as well as your in-app activity and your network location.
All these tracking technologies are referred to as ‘cookies’ here in this Cookie Statement.
How are cookies used?
Cookies are used to collect information, including:
IP address
Device ID
Viewed pages
Browser type
Browsing information
Operating system
Internet service provider
Timestamp
Whether you have responded to an advertisement
A referring URL
Features used or activities engaged in on the website/apps
They allow you to be recognised as the same user across the pages of a website, across devices, between websites or when you use our apps. When it comes to purpose, they are divided into three categories – functional cookies, analytical cookies and marketing cookies.
Functional cookies
These are cookies required for our websites and apps to function and they must be enabled in order for you to use our services.
Functional cookies are used to create technologically advanced, user-friendly websites and apps that adapt automatically to your needs and preferences, so you can browse and book easily. This also includes enabling essential security and accessibility features.
More specifically, these cookies:
Enable our website and apps to work properly, so you can create an account, sign in, and manage your bookings.
Remember your selected currency and language settings, your past searches and other preferences to help you use our website and apps efficiently and effectively.
Remember your registration information, so that you don’t have to retype your login credentials each time you visit our website or app. (Don’t worry, passwords will always be encrypted.)
Analytical cookies
These cookies measure and track how our website and apps are used. We use this information to improve our website, apps and services.
More specifically, these cookies:
Help us understand how visitors and customers like you use Booking.com and our apps.
Help improve our website, apps, and communications to make sure we're interesting and relevant.
Allow us to find out what works and what doesn't on our website and apps.
Help us understand the effectiveness of advertisements and communications.
Teach us how users interact with our website or apps after they have been shown an online advertisement, including advertisements on third-party websites.
Enable our business partners to learn whether or not their customers make use of any accommodation offers integrated into their websites.
The data we gather through these cookies can include which web pages you have viewed, which referring/exit pages you have entered and left from, which platform type you have used, which emails you have opened and acted upon, and date and time stamp information. It also means we can use details about how you’ve interacted with the site or app, such as the number of clicks you make on a given screen, your mouse movements and scrolling activity, the search words you use and the text you enter into various fields.
Marketing cookies
These cookies are used by Booking.com and our trusted partners to gather information about you over time, across multiple websites, applications, or other platforms.
Marketing cookies help us to decide which products, services and interest-based advertisements to show you, both on and off our website and apps.
More specifically, these cookies:
Categorise you into a certain interest profile, for instance, on the basis of the websites you visit and your click behaviour. We use these profiles to display personalised content (such as travel ideas or specific accommodations) on Booking.com and other websites.
Display personalised and interest-based advertisements both on the Booking.com website, our apps and other websites. This is called ‘retargeting’ and is based on your browsing activities, such as the destinations you’ve been searching for, the accommodation you’ve viewed and the prices you’ve been shown. It can also be based on your shopping habits or other online activities. Booking.com uses the services mainly from Criteo B.V., Herengracht 124, 1015 BT Amsterdam, the Netherlands, for individual retargeting ads on the basis of some information collected via our website. Using its algorithms, Criteo analyses surfing behaviour and can then display targeted product recommendations as personalised ad banners on other websites. Criteo's pixel technologies also allow us to evaluate our ad campaigns. You can find more information about Criteo’s technology in
Criteo’s Privacy Policy
.
Retargeting ads can be shown to you both before and after you leave Booking.com, as their purpose is to encourage you to browse or return to our website. You might see these ads on websites, in apps or in emails.
Integrate social media into our website and apps. This allows you to like or share content or products on social media such as Facebook, Instagram, YouTube, Twitter, Pinterest, Snapchat and LinkedIn.
These ‘like’ and ‘share’ buttons work using pieces of code from the individual social media providers, allowing third party cookies to be placed on your device.
These cookies can be purely functional, but they can also be used to keep track of which websites you visit from their network, to build a profile of your online browsing behaviour and to show you personalised ads. This profile will be partly built using comparable information the providers receive from your visits to other websites in their network.
To read more about what social media providers do with your personal data, take a look at their cookie and/or privacy statements:
Facebook
(includes Instagram, Messenger and Audience Network),
Snapchat
,
Pinterest
and
Twitter
. Be aware that these statements may be updated from time to time.
We work with trusted third parties to collect data. We may also sometimes share information with these third parties, such as your email address or phone number. These third parties might link your data to other information they collect to create custom audiences or deliver targeted ads. For information on how these third parties process your data, please take a look at the following links:
How Google uses information
,
Facebook's data policy
.
Non-cookie techniques – email pixels
We may also use techniques, such as pixels, which we don’t mark as cookies because they do not store any information on your device.
We sometimes place pixels in emails, such as newsletters. A ‘pixel’ is an electronic file the size of a single pixel, that is placed in the email and loaded when you open it. By using email pixels, we can see if the message was delivered, if and when you read the message and what you click on.
We also receive this information about the push notifications we send you. These statistics provide us with feedback about your reading behaviour, which we use to optimise our messages and make our communication more relevant to you.
What are your choices?
To learn more about cookies and how to manage or delete them, visit
allaboutcookies.org
or the help section of your browser.
In the settings for browsers like Internet Explorer, Safari, Firefox or Chrome, you can choose which cookies to accept and which to reject. Where you find these settings depends on which browser you use:
Cookie settings in Chrome
Cookie settings in Firefox
Cookie settings in Internet Explorer
Cookie settings in Safari
If you choose to block certain functional cookies, you may not be able to use some features of our services.
In addition to specific settings that we may offer on the Booking.com and apps, you can also opt-out of certain cookies:
Analytics
To prevent Google Analytics from collecting analytical data on certain browser types visit the following link:
Google Analytics Opt-out Browser Add-on
(only available on desktop).
Advertising
We always aim to work with advertising and marketing companies that are members of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI) and/or the Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB).
Members of the NAI and IAB adhere to industry standards and codes of conduct and allow you to opt out of behavioural advertising.
Visit
www.networkadvertising.org
to identify NAI members that may have placed advertising cookies on your computer. To opt out of any NAI member's behavioural advertising programme, just check the box that corresponds to that company.
You may also want to visit
www.youronlinechoices.com
or
www.youradchoices.com
to learn how to opt out of customised ads.
It’s possible that your mobile device allows you to limit information sharing for retargeting purposes through its settings. If you choose to do so, it’s good to be aware that opting out of an online advertising network doesn't mean you’ll no longer see or be subject to online advertising or marketing analysis. It just means that the network you've opted out from will stop delivering ads that are tailored to your web preferences and browsing patterns.
Some websites have ‘Do Not Track’ features that allow you to tell a website not to track you. We’re currently unable to support ‘Do Not Track’ browser settings.
How to contact us
If you have any questions about this cookie statement, please send an email to
dataprotectionoffice@booking.com
.
Our cookie statement may also be updated from time to time. If these updates are substantial, particularly relevant to you or impact your data protection rights, we’ll get in touch with you about them. However, we recommend that you visit this page regularly to stay up to date with any other (less substantial or relevant) updates.
Start of dialog content
How does it work?
1
It starts with a booking
It starts with a booking
The only way to leave a review is to first make a booking. That's how we know our reviews come from real guests who have stayed at the property.
2
Followed by a trip
Followed by a trip
When guests stay at the property they check out how quiet the room is, how friendly the staff are and more.
3
And finally, a review
And finally, a review
After their trip, guests tell us about their stay. We check for naughty words and verify the authenticity of all guest reviews before adding them to our site.
If you booked through us and want to leave a review, please sign in first.
End of dialog content
«
»
Mo
Tu
We
Th
Fr
Sa
Su
Close calendar
Sign in to your account
or use one of these optionsSkip to main content
Print / Save
Privacy and Cookie Statement
Privacy Statement
5 Sept 2024
First things first – your privacy is important to us. That might be the kind of thing all these notices say, but we mean it. You place your trust in us by using Booking.com services and we value that trust. That means we’re committed to protecting and safeguarding your personal data. We act in our customers’ best interest and we are transparent about the processing of your personal data.
This document (‘this Privacy Statement’ or ‘our Privacy Statement’) describes how we use and process your personal data, provided in a readable and transparent manner. It also tells you what rights you can exercise in relation to your personal data and how you can contact us. Please also read our
Cookie Statement
, which tells you how Booking.com uses cookies and other similar tracking technologies.
If you’ve used us before, you know that Booking.com offers online travel-related services through our own websites and mobile apps, as well as other online platforms such as partners’ websites and social media. We’d like to point out that all the information you are about to read, generally applies to all of these platforms.
In fact, this single privacy statement applies to any kind of customer information we collect through all of the above platforms or by any other means connected to these platforms.
If you are one of our business partners, make sure to also check out our
Privacy Statement for Business Partners
to understand how personal data is further processed as part of the business relationship.
We might amend this Privacy Statement from time to time, so we recommend you visit this page occasionally to make sure you know where you stand. If we make any updates to this Privacy Statement that will impact you significantly, we’ll inform you about the changes before any new activities begin.
Terms we use in this Privacy Statement
'Trip' means the various different travel products and services that can be ordered, acquired, purchased, bought, paid, rented, provided, reserved, combined, or consummated by you from the Trip Provider.
'Trip Provider' means the provider of accommodation (e.g. hotel, motel, apartment, bed & breakfast, landlord), attractions (e.g. (theme) parks, museums, sightseeing tours), transportation provider (e.g. car rentals, cruises, rail, airport rides, coach tours, transfers), tour operators, travel insurances and any other travel or related product or service as from time to time available for Trip Reservation on the platform.
'Trip Service' means the online purchase, order, (facilitated) payment or reservation service as offered or enabled by Booking.com in respect of various products and services as from time to time made available by Trip Providers on the platform.
'Trip Reservation' means the order, purchase, payment, booking or reservation of a Trip.
What kind of personal data does Booking.com collect?
We can’t help you book the perfect Trip without information, so when you use our services there are certain things we ask for. This is typically routine information – your name, preferred contact details, the names of the people travelling with you and your payment information. You might also decide to submit additional information related to your upcoming Trip (for example, your anticipated arrival time).
In addition to this, we also collect information from the computer, phone, tablet or other device you use to access our services. This includes the IP address, the browser you’re using and your language settings. There are also situations in which we receive information about you from others or when we automatically collect other information.
This is the general overview but if you’d like to know more about the information we collect, we go into more detail below.
Read more about the personal data we collect
Why does Booking.com collect and use your personal data?
The main reason we ask you for personal details is to help you organise your online Trip Reservations and ensure you get the best service possible.
We also use your personal data to contact you about the latest deals, special offers and other products or services we think you might be interested in. There are other uses, too. If you’d like to find out what they are, read on for a more detailed explanation.
Read more about why Booking.com collects your data
How does Booking.com share your data with third parties?
There are different parties integrated into Booking.com’s services, in various ways and for various reasons. The primary reason we share your data is to supply the Trip Provider with the relevant information to complete your Trip Reservation.
We also involve other parties to provide you with the Booking.com services. This includes, for example, financial institutions, advertisers, subsidiaries of the Booking.com corporate group and the other companies that form the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group. Or, in some cases, if we’re required to by law, we might share your data with governmental or other authorities
Below, we go into more detail about how the information you share with us is used and exchanged with these parties.
Read more about how data is shared with third parties
How is your personal data shared within the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group?
Booking.com is part of the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group. Read on to find out more about how your data may be shared within the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group.
Read more about data within Booking Holdings Inc.
How is your personal data shared and further processed for ground transport services?
Booking.com and Rentalcars.com – also part of the Booking Holdings Inc. group of companies – jointly use your data to offer you ground transport services via the Booking.com websites and apps (such as
cars.booking.com
or
taxi.booking.com
). Read more to understand the scope and limited nature of our joint responsibility.
Read more about data and our ground transport services
How is your personal data shared and further processed for insurance services?
We work with different parties when offering insurance services. Follow the link below to understand how your data is used and shared for insurance purposes and learn about the responsibilities of the parties involved.
Read more about data and insurance products and services
How does Booking.com process communications that you and your Trip Provider may send via Booking.com?
Booking.com can help you and Trip Providers exchange information or requests about services and existing Trip Reservations, through the Booking.com platform. If you want to find out more about how Booking.com receives and handles these communications, read on here.
Read more about how these communications are processed
How does Booking.com make use of mobile devices?
We offer free apps, through which we also collect and process personal data. This works in much the same way as our website, but they also allow you to benefit from the location services available on your mobile device(s).
Read more about how we use data from mobile devices
How does Booking.com make use of social media?
The use of social media may be integrated into Booking.com services in various ways. These will involve us collecting some of your personal data or the social media provider receiving some of your information. We don’t use WhatsApp or similar third-party services to request booking or payment confirmations.
Read more about how we use social media data
How does Booking.com use artificial intelligence and make automated decisions?
Booking.com is always looking for opportunities to innovate and improve the services offered to you. In some cases, we may use new technologies such as Artificial Intelligence (AI) and decision automation systems.
Read more about how we use AI and make automated decisions
What security and retention procedures does Booking.com put in place to safeguard your personal data?
We have implemented a range of procedures to prevent unauthorised access to, and the misuse of, personal data that we process.
Read more about security and retention procedures
How does Booking.com treat personal data belonging to children?
Unless indicated otherwise, Booking.com is a service you are only allowed to use if you are over 18 years of age. We only process information about children with the consent of their parents or legal guardians, or when the information is shared with us by the parents or legal guardians themselves.
Read more about the personal data of under 18s
How can you control the personal data you’ve given to Booking.com?
Among others, you have the right to review the personal data we keep about you at any time and request access to or deletion of your personal data by submitting
this form
. If you want to find out more about your rights to control your personal data, read on.
Read more about how you can control your personal data
Who is responsible for the processing of personal data on the Booking.com website and apps?
Booking.com B.V., located in Amsterdam, The Netherlands, controls the processing of personal data for the provision of its services. That includes its websites and mobile apps, except for some exceptions that are clarified in this privacy statement.
Read more about Booking.com B.V.'s responsibility for personal data
Country-specific provisions
Depending on the law that applies to you, we may be required to provide some additional information. If applicable, you will find additional information for your country or region below.
Read more about country-specific provisions
What kind of personal data does Booking.com collect?
OK, so you’re looking for some more in-depth information. Here’s a closer look at what we collect.
Personal data you give to us.
Booking.com collects and uses information you provide to us. When you make a Trip Reservation, you are (at a minimum) asked for your name and email address.
Depending on the Trip Reservation, we may also ask for your home address, telephone number, payment information, date of birth, current location (in the case of on-demand services), the names of the people travelling with you and any preferences you might have for your Trip (such as dietary or accessibility requirements). In some cases you may also be able to check-in online with the Trip Provider, for which we will ask you to share passport information or a driving licence and signatures.
If you need to get in touch with our customer service team, contact your Trip Provider through us, or reach out to us in a different way (such as social media or via a chatbot) we’ll collect information from you there, too. This applies whether you are contacting us with feedback or asking for help using our services.
You might also be invited to write reviews to help inform others about the experiences you had on your Trip. When you write a review on the Booking.com platform, we’ll collect any information you’ve included, along with your first name and avatar (if you choose one).
There are other instances where you’ll provide us with information, as well. For example, if you’re browsing with your mobile device, you can decide to allow Booking.com to see your current location or grant us access to some contact details. This helps us to give you the best possible service and experience by, for example, showing you our city guides, suggesting the nearest restaurants or attractions to your location or making other recommendations.
If you create a user account, we’ll also store your personal settings, uploaded photos, and reviews of previous bookings there. This saved data can be used to help you plan and manage future Trip Reservations or personalised recommendations or benefit from other features only available to account holders (such as incentives or other benefits).
You can also choose to add details from your identification documents to your user accounts, so that you don’t have to submit this information for each individual Trip Reservation.
We may offer you referral programs or sweepstakes, and participating in these will mean providing us with relevant personal data.
Personal data you give us about others.
If you have a Booking.com for Business account, you can keep an address book there to make it easier to plan and manage business travel arrangements for others.
If you make a Trip Reservation for another person or people or together with others, you may share personal data about others in relation to the Trip Reservation.
In some cases, you might use Booking.com to share information with others. This can take the form of sharing a wishlist, or participating in a referral programme, as described when you use the relevant feature.
At this point, we have to make it clear that it’s your responsibility to ensure that the person or people you have provided personal data about are aware that you’ve done so, and that they can understand how Booking.com uses their information (as described in this Privacy Statement).
Personal data we collect automatically.
Whether or not you end up making a Trip Reservation, when you visit our websites or apps we automatically collect certain information. This includes your IP address, the date and time you accessed our services, and information about your computer’s hardware and software (such as the operating system, the internet browser used, software/application version data and your language settings). We also collect information about clicks and which pages have been shown to you, for instance via the cookies that we drop.
If you’re using a mobile device, we collect data that identifies the device, as well as data about your device-specific settings and characteristics, app crashes and other system activity. When you make a Trip Reservation using this kind of device, our system registers how you made your reservation (on which website), and/or which site you came from when you entered the Booking.com website or app.
Personal data we receive from other sources.
It’s not just the things you tell us, though – we may also receive information about you from other sources. These can include business partners, such as affiliate partners, subsidiaries of the Booking.com corporate group, other companies in the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group and other independent third parties.
Information we receive from these partners may be used together with other information provided by you. For example, Booking.com Trip Reservation services are not only made available via Booking.com and the Booking.com apps but are also integrated into services of affiliate partners you can find online. When you use any of these services, we may receive data about your Trip Reservation from our affiliate partners.
We also integrate with third-party service providers to facilitate payments between you and Trip Providers. These service providers share payment information so we can administer and handle your Trip Reservation.
Additionally, we collect information in the regrettable case that we receive a complaint about you from a Trip Provider, for example in the case of misconduct. In case of concerns about integrity and/or safety incidents against our guests, our partners or Booking.com, Booking.com collects information from publicly available sources to prevent or detect harm. We cannot prevent that some of that information may contain special categories of personal data.
Another way we might receive data about you, is through the communication services integrated into our platforms. These communication services offer you a way to contact theTrip Provider you’ve booked with to discuss your stay. In some cases, we receive metadata about these communication activities (such as who you are, where you called from, and the date and length of the call).
We may also receive information about you in order to show you more relevant ads, such as the additional cookie data Booking.com social media partners make available to us. Please read the section
Why does Booking.com collect and use your personal data?
for more information.
When you link your Booking.com user account to your social media account, you might trigger exchanges of data between Booking.com and that social media provider. You can always choose not to share that data.
Trip Providers may share information about you with Booking.com, too. This could happen if you have support questions about a pending Trip Reservation, or if disputes or other issues arise about a Trip Reservation.
Why does Booking.com collect and use your personal data?
We use the information collected about you for a variety of purposes. Your personal data may be used in the following ways:
Trip Reservations: First and foremost, we use your personal data to complete and administer your online Trip Reservation – which is essential for us to provide this service for you. This includes sending you communications that relate to your Trip Reservation, such as confirmations (including, where applicable, providing you with a proof of purchase and/or payment), modifications and reminders. In some cases, this may also include processing your personal data to enable online check-in with the Trip Provider or processing personal data in relation to possible damage deposits.
Customer service: We provide international customer service from our local offices in more than 20 languages, and we’re here to help 24 hours a day, 7 days a week. Sharing relevant details, such as reservation information or information about your user account with our global customer service staff allows us to respond when you need us. This includes helping you to contact the right Trip Provider and responding to any questions you might have about your Trip Reservation (or any other queries, for that matter).
Account facilities: Booking.com users can create an account on our website or apps. We use the information you give us to administer this account, allowing you to do a number of useful things. You can manage your Trip Reservations, take advantage of special offers, make future Trip Reservations easily and manage your personal settings.
Managing personal settings gives you the ability to keep and share lists, share photos, easily see Trip Services you’ve searched for and check travel-related information you’ve provided. You can also see any reviews you’ve written.
If you want to, you can share certain information as part of your user account, by creating a public profile under your own first name or a screen name you choose. If you are logged in to your account and you want to create a Business account, we may use your name and email address to pre-fill the sign up form.
If you’re a Booking.com for Business account holder, you can also save contact details under that account, manage business reservations and link other account holders to the same Booking.com for Business account.
Online groups: We may give account holders the chance to connect and interact with each other through online groups or forums.
Marketing activities: We use your contact information, reservation details, account information, browsing data, location data and preferences for marketing activities. These activities include:
Using your contact information and (collected via cookies and similar tracking technologies) your interaction with the Booking.com platform to send you personalised marketing messages (for example via push notifications or email) from Booking.com, including promotions, search assistant messages, Genius and other rewards, travel experiences, surveys and updates about Booking.com’s products and services. You can unsubscribe from receiving email marketing communications quickly, easily and at any time. All you need to do is click on the ‘Unsubscribe’ link included in each newsletter or other communication, or manage your preferences via your account settings.
Based on your interaction on the Booking.com platform (collected via cookies and similar tracking technologies), personalised marketing from Booking.com including promotions, search assistant messages, Genius and other rewards, travel experiences, surveys and updates about Booking.com’s products and services might be shown to you on or about the Booking.com website, on mobile apps, or on third-party websites/apps (including social media sites), and the content of the site displayed to you might be personalised. These could be offers and recommendations we think you might find interesting that you can book directly on the Booking.com platform, on co-branded sites, or on other third-party sites. Some of these recommendations may be produced on the basis of personal data we collected from you during different visits to our platform and/or on different devices, even when you are not logged in. Our
How we work
page contains more information on our Ranking and Recommender systems, including how you can manage your personalisation preferences.
When you participate in other promotional activities (such as sweepstakes, referral programmes or competitions), only relevant information will be used to administer these promotions.
Communicating with you: There might be times when we get in touch, including by email, by push notification, by chatbot, by post, by phone, or by text and/or process communications you send to us.
There could be a number of reasons for this, including:
Responding to and handling any requests you or your booked Trip Provider have made. Booking.com also offers customers and Trip Providers various ways to exchange information, requests and comments about Trip Providers and existing Trip Reservations via Booking.com. For more information, read the section titled
‘How does Booking.com process communications that you and your Trip Provider send through Booking.com?’
.
If you have started but not finished a Trip search or Reservation online, we might contact you to invite you to continue with your search or reservation. We believe that this additional service benefits you as it allows you to pick up the process where you left off without having to search for a Trip Provider or fill in your reservation details again.
When you use our products and services, we might send you a questionnaire or invite you to provide a review about your experience with Booking.com or the Trip Provider.
We also send you other material related to your Trip Reservations, such as how to contact Booking.com if you need assistance while you’re away, and information that we feel might be useful to you in planning or getting the best out of your Trip. We might also send you material related to upcoming Trip Reservations or a summary of previous Trip Reservations you made through Booking.com.
Even if you don’t have an upcoming Trip Reservation, we may still need to send you administrative messages, which could include security alerts.
In case of misconduct, we may send you a notice and/or warning.
Market research: We sometimes invite our customers to take part in market research. Please see the information that accompanies this kind of invitation to understand what personal data will be collected and how that data is used.
Improving our services: We use personal data for analytical purposes and product improvement, such as offering a more personalised experience based on how you or customers like you with similar interests use our platform for booking your chosen accommodation with us. Further, we may process your user ID, which is linked to the email address used to create your account, for the purpose of measuring the audience visiting our websites. Also your personal data may also be used for the development and enhancement of our machine-learning models and artificial intelligence tools. This is part of our commitment to making our services better and enhancing the user experience.
In this case, we use data for testing and troubleshooting purposes, as well as to generate statistics about our business. The main goal here is to get insights into how our services perform, how they are used, and ultimately to optimise and customise our website and apps, making them easier and more meaningful to use. As much as possible, we strive to use anonymised and de-identified personal data for this analytical work.
In order to achieve this purpose, we may combine personal data we collect from you during different visits to our platform or visits on different devices, even when you are not logged in.
Providing the best price applicable to you, depending on where you are based: When you search our apps or website, for example to find an accommodation, a rental car or a flight, we process your IP address to confirm whether you are in the European Economic Area (EEA) or in another country. We do this to offer you the best price for the region (EEA) or country (non-EEA) where you are based.
Customer reviews and other destination-related information: During and after your Trip, we might invite you to submit a review. We can also make it possible for the people you’re travelling with or whom you’ve booked a reservation for to do this instead. This invite asks for information about the Trip Provider or the destination.
If you have a Booking.com account, you can choose to display a screen name next to your review, instead of your real name. If you’d like to set a screen name, you can do that in your account settings. Adding an avatar is also possible.
By completing a review, you’re agreeing that it can be displayed (as described in detail in our
Terms and Conditions
) on, for example, the relevant Trip Provider information page on our websites, on our mobile apps, on our social media accounts and social media apps, or on the online platform of the relevant Trip Provider or business partner’s website. This is to inform other travellers about the quality of the Trip Service you used, the destination you have chosen or any other experiences you choose to share.
Call monitoring: When you make calls to our customer service team, Booking.com uses an automated telephone number detection system to match your telephone number to your existing reservations. This can help save time for both you and our customer service staff. However, our customer service staff may still ask for authentication, which helps to keep your reservation details confidential.
During calls with our customer service team, live listening might be carried out or calls might be recorded for quality control and training purposes. This includes the usage of the recordings for the handling of complaints, legal claims and for fraud detection.
We do not record all calls. In the case that a call is recorded, each recording is kept for a limited amount of time before being automatically deleted. This is unless we have determined that it’s necessary to keep the recording for fraud investigation or legal purposes. You can read more about this below.
Promotion of a safe and trustworthy service: To create a trustworthy environment for you, the people you bring with you on your Trip, Booking.com’s business partners, our Trip Providers and Booking.com, we continuously analyse and use certain personal data to detect and prevent fraud and other illegal or unwanted activities. In the unlikely event of concerns about integrity and/or safety incidents, we consult publicly available information, during this we cannot prevent that some of that information may include special categories of personal data.
Similarly, we use personal data for risk assessment and security purposes, including when you report a safety concern, for the authentication of users and reservations, or when others report a fraud or safety incident about you. When we do this we may have to stop or put certain Trip Reservations on hold until we’ve finished our assessment. For the purposes of detecting and preventing fraud and harm, and protecting our guests, business partners, Trip Providers and Booking.com, we may use your contact information, reservation details, reviews, account information, browsing data, location data, communications data, or other information that you or another person has provided to Booking.com. If we have concerns about serious misconduct, we may decide to cancel your upcoming reservations or to decline future reservations via our platform.
Legal purposes: In certain cases, we may need to use your information to handle and resolve legal claims and disputes, for regulatory investigations and compliance, to enforce the Booking.com online reservation service terms of use or to comply with lawful requests from law enforcement.
Providing your personal data to Booking.com is voluntary. However, we may only be able to provide you with certain services if we can collect some personal data. For instance, we can’t process your Trip Reservation if we don’t collect your name and contact details.
To process your personal data as described above, we rely on the following legal bases:
As applicable, for purpose A and B, Booking.com relies on the legal basis that the processing of personal data is necessary for the performance of a contract, specifically to finalise and administer your Trip Reservation.
If the required personal data is not provided, Booking.com cannot finalise the Trip Reservation, nor can we provide customer service. In view of purposes C to L, Booking.com relies on its (or third parties’) legitimate interest, to provide and improve services and to prevent fraud and other illegal acts (as set out more specifically under C to L). Moreover, in the unlikely event Booking.com would process special categories of personal data in the context of purpose L, Booking.com relies, where applicable, on the fact that processing relates to personal data which are manifestly made public by the data subject.
When using personal data to serve Booking.com’s or a third party's legitimate interest, Booking.com will always balance your rights and interests in the protection of your personal data against Booking.com’s rights and interests or those of the third party. For purposes M, Booking.com also relies, where applicable, on compliance with legal obligations (such as lawful law enforcement requests).
Where needed under applicable law, Booking.com will obtain your consent (or as otherwise required by law) prior to processing your personal data, including for cookies and similar tracking technologies and marketing messaging purposes.
We may use your personal data to develop and train artificial intelligence models and/or systems (AI) where the purpose of collecting your data is to provide or improve our services to you. The legal bases for using AI which we rely on are:
Beyond preventing and detecting fraud attempts, we may have a legitimate interest in developing AI to improve the efficiency and quality of our products and services. We always consider whether your rights and freedoms are infringed and will only proceed where this legitimate interest is not overridden by your rights.
In other cases where we may use AI, we will seek your consent where this is required.
If you wish to object to the processing set out under C to L or, where applicable, to the use of your personal data in the context of AI and no opt-out mechanism is available to you directly (for example, in marketing emails or your account settings), please contact us at
dataprotectionoffice@booking.com
or go to the
form
.
How does Booking.com share your data with third parties?
In certain circumstances, we’ll share your personal data with third parties. These third parties include:
The Trip Provider you booked: In order to complete your Trip Reservation, we transfer relevant reservation details to the Trip Provider you have booked. This is one of the most essential things we do for you.
Depending on the Trip Reservation and the Trip Provider, the details we share can include your name, contact and payment details, the names of the people accompanying you and any other information or preferences you specified when you made your Trip Reservation.
In certain cases, we also provide some additional historical information about you to the Trip Provider. This includes whether you’ve already booked with them in the past, the number of completed bookings you’ve made with Booking.com, a confirmation that no misconduct has been reported about you, the percentage of bookings you’ve cancelled in the past or whether you’ve given reviews about past bookings.
If you have a query about your Trip, we may contact the Trip Provider to handle your request. Unless payment is made during the booking process, via the Booking.com website, we will forward your credit card details to the booked Trip Provider for further handling (assuming you’ve provided us with those details).
In cases of Trip Reservation-related claims or disputes, we may provide the Trip Provider with your contact details and other information about the booking process, as needed to resolve the situation. This can include, but might not be limited to, your email address and a copy of your reservation confirmation as proof that a Trip Reservation was made or to confirm reasons for cancellation.
For completeness, Trip Providers will further process your personal data outside of the control of Booking.com. Trip Providers may also ask for additional personal data, for instance to provide additional services, or to comply with local restrictions. If available, please read the Privacy Statement of the Trip Provider to understand how they process your personal data.
Connectivity Providers: Please note that certain Trip Providers may need us to share your personal data with a contracted Connectivity Provider in order to be able to finalise and administer your reservation. Connectivity providers act on behalf of Trip Providers and help them to manage their reservations.
Your local Booking.com office: To support the use of Booking.com services, your details may be shared with subsidiaries of the Booking.com corporate group, including for customer service. To find out more about the Booking.com corporate group, visit
About Booking.com
.
Third-party service providers: We use service providers from outside of the Booking.com corporate group to support us in providing our services. These include:
Customer support
Market research
Fraud detection and prevention (including anti-fraud screening)
Insurance claims
Payment
We use third parties to process payments, handle chargebacks or provide billing collection services. When a chargeback is requested for your Trip Reservation, either by you or by the holder of the credit card used to make your reservation, we need to share certain reservation details with the payment service provider and the relevant financial institution so they can handle the chargeback. This may also include a copy of your reservation confirmation or the IP address used to make your reservation. We may share information with relevant financial institutions, if we consider it strictly necessary for fraud detection and prevention purposes.
When a chargeback is requested for your Trip Reservation, either by you or by the holder of the credit card used to make your reservation, we need to share certain reservation details with the payment service provider and the relevant financial institution so they can handle the chargeback. This may also include a copy of your reservation confirmation or the IP address used to make your reservation.
We may also share information with relevant financial institutions, if we consider it strictly necessary for fraud detection and prevention purposes.
Marketing services
We share personal data with advertising partners, including your email address, IP address and telephone number, as part of marketing Booking.com services via third parties (to ensure that relevant advertisements are shown to the right audience). We use techniques such as hashing to enable the matching of your email address, IP address and/or telephone number with an existing customer database, to prevent this data from being used for other purposes. For information on other personalised advertisements and your choices, please read our
Cookie Statement
.
Advertising partners
We use advertising partners, such as metasearch providers, to allow you to compare our offers with offers from other Online Travel Agencies (OTAs).  When you make a reservation on Booking.com after using an advertising partner, we will send the details of the reservation that you made on Booking.com to that partner.
Other professional third parties: In certain cases (such as disputes or legal claims or as part of auditing activities), we may need to share your personal data with professional advisors. These advisors include parties such as law firms or auditors. We only share your personal data to the extent that is necessary and such third parties process this data in line with their own professional obligations.
Competent authorities: We disclose personal data to law enforcement to the extent that it is required by law or is strictly necessary for the prevention, detection or prosecution of criminal acts and fraud. We may need to further disclose relevant personal data to competent authorities (including tax authorities and municipalities) to comply with a legal obligation (for instance, under short-term rental laws), to protect and defend our rights, or the rights and properties of our business partners.
Business partners: We work with many business partners around the world. These business partners distribute and advertise Booking.com services, including the services and products of our Trip Providers.
When you make a reservation on one of our business partners’ websites or apps, certain personal data that you give them, such as your name and email address, your address, payment details and other relevant information, may be forwarded to us to finalise and manage your Trip Reservation.
If customer service is provided by the business partner, Booking.com will share relevant reservation details with them (as and when needed) in order to provide you with appropriate and efficient support.
When you make a reservation through one of our business partners’ websites, the business partners can receive certain parts of your personal data related to the specific reservation and your interactions on these partner websites. This is for their commercial purposes.
When you make a reservation on a business partners’ website, please also take the time to read their privacy notice if you’d like to understand how they process your personal data. With these business partners we may act as joint controllers. If you choose to exercise your data subject rights with our business partners, we may collaborate to ensure an adequate response to your request.
For fraud detection and prevention purposes, we may also exchange information about our users with business partners – but only when strictly necessary.
If an insurance claim is made, concerning you and a Trip Provider, we may provide the necessary data (including personal data) to the insurance company for further processing.
Partner Offer: We may present you with a ‘Partner Offer’. When you book a stay marked ‘Partner Offer’, your reservation will be facilitated by a Trip Provider who is separate from the accommodation you’re booking. As part of the reservation process, we’ll need to share some relevant personal data with this business partner.
If you book a Partner Offer, please review the information provided in the booking process or check your reservation confirmation for more information about the Trip Provider and how they will further process your personal data.
The Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group: Read about
how we share your personal data with the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group
.
Booking.com is a global business. The data that we collect from you, as described in this Privacy Statement, could be made accessible from, transferred to or stored in countries which may not have the same data protection laws as the country in which you initially provided the information. In such cases, we will protect your data as described in this Privacy Statement.
This may also be applicable if you are in the European Economic Area (EEA). Countries your data may be transferred to may not have laws that provide the same level of protection for your personal data as laws within the EEA. Where this is the case, we will put appropriate safeguards in place to make sure that these transfers comply with relevant European regulations.
In particular, when your data is transferred to third-party service providers, we establish and implement appropriate contractual, organisational and technical measures with them. This is done by putting in place Standard Contractual Clauses as approved by the European Commission, by examining the countries to which the data may be transferred, and by imposing specific technical and organisational security measures.
In certain specific cases, we transfer your data outside the EEA because it is in your interest or is necessary to conclude or perform the contract we have with you. For instance, when you make a reservation on Booking.com or through a business partner, we might need to transfer your data to a Trip Provider or business partner who is located outside the EEA.
You can ask us to see a copy of our implemented safeguards (where possible) by contacting us at
dataprotectionoffice@booking.com
.
How is your personal data shared within the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group?
Booking.com is part of the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group. More information is available at
Bookingholdings.com
.
We may receive personal data about you from other companies in the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group, or share your personal data with them, for the following purposes:
To provide services (including to make, administer and manage reservations or handle payments)
To provide customer service
To detect, prevent and investigate fraudulent, other illegal activities and data breaches
For analytical and product improvement purposes where permitted by applicable law;
To provide personalised offers or send you marketing with your consent or as otherwise permitted by applicable law
For hosting, technical support, overall maintenance and maintaining security of such shared data
To ensure compliance with applicable laws
As applicable and unless indicated otherwise, for purposes A to F, Booking.com relies on its legitimate interests to share and receive personal data. For purpose G, Booking.com relies, where applicable, on compliance with legal obligations (such as lawful law enforcement requests). In the EEA, Booking also ensures that data flows between companies in the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group comply with relevant European regulations such as the Digital Markets Act.
For example, Booking.com works closely with Rentalcars.com to offer ground transport services to customers. Please read
How is your personal data shared and further processed for ground transport services?
for more information.
All companies within the Booking Holdings Inc. group of companies may need to exchange personal customer data to ensure all users are protected from fraudulent activities on its online platforms.
How is your personal data shared and further processed for ground transport services?
Booking.com Transport Limited, trading as Rentalcars.com, is a private limited liability company, incorporated under the laws of the United Kingdom with offices at 6 Goods Yard Street, Manchester, M3 3BG, United Kingdom.
Booking.com and Rentalcars.com (both part of the Booking Holdings Inc. group of companies) work together closely to offer you ground transport services via Booking.com websites and apps, such as cars.booking.com or taxi.booking.com.
The ground transportation services offered by Booking.com websites and apps are operated by Rentalcars.com, under the Booking.com brand. This means that when you're booking or browsing for ground transport services via the app or website, Booking.com and Rentalcars.com are collectively responsible for the collection and use of your personal data.
In addition to the data we process to allow you to search for ground transport services and make your booking, Booking.com and Rentalcars.com can also use your personal data independently. This is in line with the purposes set out in this Privacy Statement and the Rentalcars.com Privacy Notice.
For further information about the relationship between Booking.com and Rentalcars.com, and to exercise your rights regarding your personal data that is collected via the Booking.com websites and apps, please feel free to contact Booking.com at any time. You can do this via the email address under
'Who is responsible for the processing of personal data via Booking.com and how to contact us?
'.
How is your personal data shared and further processed for insurance services?
Booking.com Distribution B.V. is a sister company of Booking.com with registered offices at Oosterdokskade 163, 1011 DL, Amsterdam, The Netherlands. Booking.com and Booking.com Distribution B.V. work closely together to offer customers different insurance products and services for Trip Reservations, for example room cancellation insurance.
The offering of insurance can involve multiple parties, such as intermediaries, underwriters, and other agents. Where Booking.com Distribution B.V. is involved, it will act as the intermediary and authorised agent or appointed representative (depending on the jurisdiction) on behalf of the insurer, by offering insurance products and services to Booking.com customers.
Please review the information provided during the booking process for more information about Booking.com Distribution B.V and the parties who work together with Booking.com to offer you these products and services. The details of the insurer will be visible in the insurance policy and related documentation provided to you.
When offering insurance, Booking.com and Booking.com Distribution B.V. may have to use and share personal data that is relevant to the insurance product. This data relates to you as a potential or actual policyholder, the beneficiaries under a policy, family members, claimants and other parties involved in a claim:
To provide offers, arrange insurance cover and handle insurance claims, some personal data, provided to us during the booking process, (‘General Order Data’) may have to be shared with Booking.com Distribution B.V.. You may also be asked to provide additional information, such as names of family members or other beneficiaries or details about a claim (‘Insurance-Specific Data’).
If you make a claim under an insurance policy, this claim may be directly handled by the insurer. This means that you may be asked to provide personal data in order to submit the claim directly to them. The insurer will inform you accordingly at the point of collection of your information. When your claim is handled by the insurer, Booking.com may receive information about the status of your claim in order to provide you with customer support services.
When Booking.com Distribution B.V. acts as an intermediary for insurance products and services via Booking.com, the two companies are jointly responsible for the collection of Insurance-Specific Data and its transmission from Booking.com to Booking.com Distribution B.V. However, Booking.com Distribution B.V. acts as the sole controller for any processing outside of the Booking.com B.V. systems. Any personal data collected by Booking.com for insurance purposes will be processed as set out in this Privacy Statement.
For further information about the relationship between Booking.com and Booking.com Distribution B.V., and to exercise your rights regarding personal data that is collected via the Booking.com website and apps,
please contact us
.
How does Booking.com process communications that you and your booked Trip Provider may send via Booking.com?
Booking.com can offer you and Trip Providers various ways to communicate about the Trip Services and existing Trip Reservations, directing the communications via Booking.com. This also allows you and your Trip Provider to contact Booking.com with questions about your Trip Reservation through the website, our apps and the other channels that we make available.
Booking.com accesses communications and may use automated systems to review, scan, and analyse communications for the following reasons:
Security purposes
Fraud prevention
Compliance with legal and regulatory requirements
Investigations of potential misconduct
Product development and improvement
Research
Customer engagement (including to provide you with information and offers that we believe may be of interest to you)
Customer or technical support
We reserve the right to review or block the delivery of communications that we, in our sole discretion, believe might contain malicious content or spam, or pose a risk to you, Trip Providers, Booking.com or others.
All communications sent or received using Booking.com communication tools will be received and stored by Booking.com. Trip Providers and Business partners you’ve booked a Trip Reservation through might also choose to communicate with you directly by email or through other channels that Booking.com does not control.
How does Booking.com make use of mobile devices?
We offer free apps for a range of different mobile devices, as well as versions of our regular website that have been optimised for browsing on a mobile and tablet.
These apps and mobile websites process the personal details you give us in much the same way as our website does. They also allow you to use location services to find Trip Services nearby, if you want to.
With your consent, we may send you push notifications with information about your Trip Reservation. You can also choose to grant us access to your location data or contact details in order to provide services you’ve requested. If you upload pictures to our platform, these pictures may include location information (known as metadata) as well. Please read your mobile device’s instructions to understand how to change your settings and control the sharing of this category of data.
When you choose to use our ‘Voice Assistant’ to search our services or manage your bookings, your speech will be anonymously translated into text by a third-party service provider. You will need to give us access to your device's microphone to use this feature.
In order to optimise our services and marketing activities, and to make sure we give you a consistent user experience, we use something known as ‘cross-device tracking’. This can be done with or without the use of cookies. For more general information about cookies and other similar technologies, please see our
Cookie statement
.
With cross-device tracking, Booking.com is able to track user activity across multiple devices. As part of cross-device tracking, we may combine data collected from a particular browser or mobile device with data from another computer or device used by the same customer.
In order to optimise the content of the Booking.com newsletter, we combine searches and reservations made from different computers and devices. You can unsubscribe from the Booking.com newsletter at any time.
Personalised ads shown to you on other websites or in apps, can be offered based on your activities on linked computers and devices. By changing the cookie settings on your device (see our
Cookie statement
under ‘What are your choices?’), you can change your cross-device tracking settings for advertisement purposes. You should know that logging out of your Booking.com account doesn’t mean that you will no longer receive personalised ads.
How does Booking.com make use of social media?
At Booking.com, we use social media in different ways. We use it to facilitate the use of online reservation services, but also to promote our Trip Providers’ travel-related products and services and to advertise, improve and facilitate our own services.
Note that the use of social media features can result in the exchange of personal data between Booking.com and the social media service provider, as we describe below. You are free not to use any of the social media features available to you.
Sign in with your social media account. We offer you the opportunity to sign in to a Booking.com user account with one of your social media accounts. We do this to reduce the need for you to remember different usernames and passwords for different online services.
After you’ve signed in once, you’ll be able to use your social media account to sign into your Booking.com account. You can decouple your Booking.com user account from your chosen social media account any time you want to.
Integration of social media plugins. We have also integrated social media plugins into the Booking.com website and apps. This means that when you click or tap on one of the buttons (such as Facebook’s ‘Like’ button), certain information is shared with these social media providers.
If you’re logged into your social media account when you click or tap one of these buttons, your social media provider may relate this information to your social media account. Depending on your settings, they might also display these actions on your social media profile, to be seen by others in your network.
Other social media services and features. We may integrate other social media services (like social media messaging) for you to interact with Booking.com or with your contacts about our services.
We may maintain social media accounts and offer apps on several social media sites. Whenever you connect with Booking.com through social media, your social media service provider may allow you to share information with us.
If you choose to share, your social media provider will generally inform you about which information will be shared. For example, when you sign into a Booking.com user account using your social media account, certain information from that account may be shared with Booking.com. This includes your email address, your age and the profile pictures you’ve saved – depending on what you authorise in your social media account.
When you register with a Booking.com social media app or connect to a social media messaging service without a Booking.com user account, the information you choose to share with us may include the basic information available in your social media profile (including your email address, status updates and a list of your contacts).
We’ll use this information to help provide you with the service you requested – for example, to forward a message you want to send to your contacts or to create a personalised user experience in the app or on our websites. It means that if you want us to, we can tailor our services to suit your needs, connecting you and your friends with the best travel destinations and analysing and improving our travel-related services.  Please note that we don’t use WhatsApp or similar third-party services to request booking or payment confirmations. If you receive, for example, a WhatsApp message asking you to follow a link to guarantee your booking or complete a related payment, do not reply to this message or follow that link. Instead, we ask that you report the message to our
Customer Service
team.
Your social media provider will be able to tell you more about how they use and process your data when you connect to Booking.com through them. This can include combining the personal data they collect when you use Booking.com through them with information they collect when you use other online platforms you have also linked to your social media account.
If you decide to connect using your Facebook or Google account, please review the following links for information about how these parties use data they receive:
Facebook
and
Google
.
How we use artificial intelligence and make automated decisions
We are always looking for opportunities to innovate and improve the customer experience by using new technologies such as AI. We currently use AI for the following purposes:
Promotion of a safe and trustworthy service and prevention of fraud.
Showing you the most relevant content. We use AI to improve the customer experience and personalization on our platforms (such as providing you with summarised reviews). This may include sending you details of a trip we think you would be interested in (where you have consented to this communication) and ranking search results to put the best matches at the top of your feed.
Our
How we work
page contains more information on our recommendation systems, including on how you can manage your personalisation preferences.
Improving our services. We use AI to improve trip services in accordance with the details set out in the section
Why does Booking.com collect and use your personal data?
This includes the identification of trends, monitoring the operations of the platform, troubleshooting our websites and apps as well as improving the services we offer to you.
Developing AI interactive chats to allow you to ask questions about a trip or service and receive AI-generated relevant responses or itinerary suggestions.
Improving the effectiveness of the other purposes set out in this privacy statement.
We assess our AI against data protection principles, such as minimisation, accuracy, and purpose limitation. We take steps to prevent data inaccuracies, harm and biases from our use of AI.
See the section titled
What security and retention procedures does Booking.com put in place to safeguard your personal data?
for more information regarding the safeguards we have implemented which will also apply to personal data we process to train or use AI.
In most cases, the use of AI will not result in an automated decision being made about you. When we provide you with a trip recommendation using AI, this is only a suggestion, and you have control over how this is used.
We do not currently use any solely automated systems to make a decision about you which would result in a legal or similarly significant effect on you. We will inform you if this changes and will ensure that we have implemented suitable measures to safeguard your rights and freedoms. Sometimes, AI will contribute to a decision we make. AI that is used to inform or monitor the platform, for example for fraud attempts, will not autonomously make any decision that will have a significant impact on you. Where an AI identifies a possible issue a member of our team will complete the review and make an informed decision. In limited cases, we may complete decision-making without human review after we have assessed that the decision would not result in a significant effect on you.
If you would like to know more about our use of AI, contact us as described in the section
How can you control the personal data you’ve given to Booking.com?
What security and retention procedures does Booking.com put in place to safeguard your personal data?
We have procedures in place to prevent unauthorised access to, and the misuse of, personal data.
We use appropriate business systems and procedures to protect and safeguard your personal data. We also use security procedures and technical and physical restrictions for accessing and using the personal data on our servers. Only authorised personnel are permitted to access personal data in the course of their work.
We’ll keep your personal data for as long as is necessary to enable you to use our services or to provide our services to you (including maintaining any Booking.com user accounts you may have), to comply with applicable laws, resolve any disputes and otherwise to allow us to conduct our business, including to detect and prevent fraud and/or other illegal activities. All personal data we keep about you as a Booking.com customer is covered by this Privacy Statement.
For added protection, we strongly recommend that you set up two-factor authentication for your Booking.com user account. This adds an extra authentication step, to make sure that anyone who gets hold of your username and password (e.g. through phishing or social engineering) won’t be able to get into your account. You can set this up in the Security section of your account settings.
How does Booking.com treat personal data belonging to children?
Our services aren’t intended for children under 18 years old, and we’ll never collect their data unless it’s provided by (and with the consent of) a parent or guardian. The limited circumstances we might need to collect the personal data of children under 18 years old include part of a reservation, the purchase of other travel-related services, or other exceptional circumstances (such as features addressed to families). Again, this will only be used and collected as provided by a parent or guardian and with their consent.
If we become aware that we’ve processed the information of a child under 18 years old without the valid consent of a parent or guardian, we will delete it.
How can you control the personal data you’ve given to Booking.com?
We want you to be in control of how your personal data is used by us. You can do this in the following ways:
We want you to be in control of how your personal data is used by us. You can do this in the following ways:
You can ask us for a copy of the personal data we hold about you,
You can inform us of any changes to your personal data, or you can ask us to correct any of the personal data we hold about you. As explained below, you can make some of these changes yourself, online, when you have a user account,
In certain situations, you can ask us to erase, block, or restrict the processing of the personal data we hold about you, or object to particular ways in which we are using your personal data,
In certain situations, you can also ask us to send the personal data you have given us to a third party,
Where we are using your personal data on the basis of your consent, you are entitled to withdraw that consent at any time subject to applicable law, and
Where we process your personal data based on legitimate interest or the public interest, you have the right to object to that use of your personal data at any time, subject to applicable law.
We rely on you to make sure that your personal information is complete, accurate and current. Please do let us know about any changes to, or inaccuracies in, your personal information as soon as possible.
If you have a Booking.com user account, you can access a lot of your personal data through our website or apps. You’ll generally find the option to add, update or remove information we have about you in your account settings.
Users with a Booking.com account can also request that we delete your account through the Booking.com app. Note that app features can vary between operating systems and their third-party software providers.
If any of the personal data we have about you isn’t accessible through our website or apps, you can send us a request.
If you want to exercise your right of access or erasure, all you need to do is complete and submit the
Data Subject Request for Booking.com Customers
form. For any requests relating to this Privacy Statement, to exercise any of your other rights, or if you have a complaint, please contact our Data Protection Officer at
dataprotectionoffice@booking.com
. You can also contact your local data protection authority.
If you’d like to object to your personal data being processed on the basis of legitimate interest and there’s no way to opt out directly, please contact us at
dataprotectionoffice@booking.com
.
If you’d like to contact us by post, please address it to the Data Protection Officer and use the following postal address: Oosterdokskade 163, 1011 DL, Amsterdam, Netherlands.
Who is responsible for the processing of personal data via Booking.com and how to contact us?
Booking.com B.V. controls the processing of personal data, as described in this Privacy Statement, except where explicitly stated otherwise. Booking.com B.V. is a private limited liability company, incorporated under the laws of the Netherlands and has its offices at Oosterdokskade 163, 1011 DL Amsterdam, Netherlands.
If you have any questions about this Privacy Statement, or about our processing of your personal data, please contact our Data Protection Officer at dataprotectionoffice@booking.com and we’ll get back to you as soon as possible.  If you have any questions related to your reservation or you need customer service support, please follow this
link
.
For questions about a reservation, please contact our customer service team through the
customer service contact page
.
Requests from law enforcement should be submitted using the
Law Enforcement
process.
Country-specific provisions
Depending on the law that applies to you, we may be required to provide some additional information. If applicable, you will find additional information for your country or region below.
https://www.bravofly.com/en/info/privacy/bravonext.html
Cookie statement
Whenever you use our online services or apps, we use cookies and other online tracking technologies (which we’ll also refer to as 'cookies' for the purpose of this Cookie Statement).
Cookies can be used in various ways, including to make the Booking.com website work, to analyse traffic, or for advertising purposes.
Read on below to learn more about what a ‘cookie’ is, how they’re used and what your choices are.
What are cookies and other online tracking technologies?
How are cookies used?
What are your choices?
What are cookies and online tracking technologies?
A web browser cookie is a small text file that websites place on your computer’s or mobile device’s web browser.
These cookies store information about the content you view and interact with, in order to remember your preferences and settings or analyse how you use online services.
Cookies are divided into ‘first party’ and ‘third party’:
First party cookies
are the cookies served by the owner of the domain – in our case that’s Booking.com. Any cookie we place ourselves is a ‘first party cookie’.
Third party cookies
are cookies placed on our domains by trusted partners that we’ve chosen to allow to do so. These can be social media partners, advertising partners, security providers and more.
And they can be either ‘session cookies’ or ‘permanent cookies’:
Session cookies
only exist until you close your browser, ending what is called your ‘session’. They are then deleted.
Permanent cookies
have a range of different lifespans and stay on your device after the browser is closed. On the Booking.com platform, we try to only serve permanent cookies (or allow permanent cookies to be served by third parties) that have a limited lifespan. However, for security reasons, or in other exceptional circumstances, we might sometimes need to give a cookie a longer lifespan.
Web browser cookies may store information such as your IP address or another identifier, your browser type, and information about the content you view and interact with on digital services. By storing this information, web browser cookies can remember your preferences and settings for online services and analyse how you use them.
Alongside cookies, we also use tracking technologies that are very similar. Our website, emails and mobile apps may contain small transparent image files or lines of code that record how you interact with them. These include ‘web beacons’, ‘scripts’, ‘tracking URLs’ or ‘software development kits’ (known as SDKs):
Web beacons
have a lot of different names. They might also be known as web bugs, tracking bugs, tags, web tags, page tags, tracking pixels, pixel tags, 1x1 GIFs or clear GIFs.
In short, these beacons are a tiny graphic image of just one pixel that can be delivered to your device as part of a web page request, in an app, an advertisement or an HTML email message.
They can be used to retrieve information from your device, such as your device type or operating system, your IP address, and the time of your visit. They are also used to serve and read cookies in your browser or to trigger the placement of a cookie.
Scripts
are small computer programs embedded within our web pages that give those pages a wide variety of extra functionality. Scripts make it possible for the website to function properly. For example, scripts power certain security features and enable basic interactive features on our website.
Scripts can also be used for analytical or advertising purposes. For example, a script can collect information about how you use our website, such as which pages you visit or what you search for.
Tracking URLs
are links with a unique identifier in them. These are used to track which website brought you to the Booking.com website or app you’re using. An example would be if you click through from a social media page, search engine or one of our affiliate partners’ websites.
Software Development Kits (SDKs)
are part of our apps’ source code and unlike browser cookies, SDK data is stored in the app storage.
They’re used to analyse how the apps are being used or to send personalised push notifications. To do this, they record unique identifiers associated with your device, like device ID and IP address, as well as your in-app activity and your network location.
All these tracking technologies are referred to as ‘cookies’ here in this Cookie Statement.
How are cookies used?
Cookies are used to collect information, including:
IP address
Device ID
Viewed pages
Browser type
Browsing information
Operating system
Internet service provider
Timestamp
Whether you have responded to an advertisement
A referring URL
Features used or activities engaged in on the website/apps
They allow you to be recognised as the same user across the pages of a website, across devices, between websites or when you use our apps. When it comes to purpose, they are divided into three categories – functional cookies, analytical cookies and marketing cookies.
Functional cookies
These are cookies required for our websites and apps to function and they must be enabled in order for you to use our services.
Functional cookies are used to create technologically advanced, user-friendly websites and apps that adapt automatically to your needs and preferences, so you can browse and book easily. This also includes enabling essential security and accessibility features.
More specifically, these cookies:
Enable our website and apps to work properly, so you can create an account, sign in, and manage your bookings.
Remember your selected currency and language settings, your past searches and other preferences to help you use our website and apps efficiently and effectively.
Remember your registration information, so that you don’t have to retype your login credentials each time you visit our website or app. (Don’t worry, passwords will always be encrypted.)
Analytical cookies
These cookies measure and track how our website and apps are used. We use this information to improve our website, apps and services.
More specifically, these cookies:
Help us understand how visitors and customers like you use Booking.com and our apps.
Help improve our website, apps, and communications to make sure we're interesting and relevant.
Allow us to find out what works and what doesn't on our website and apps.
Help us understand the effectiveness of advertisements and communications.
Teach us how users interact with our website or apps after they have been shown an online advertisement, including advertisements on third-party websites.
Enable our business partners to learn whether or not their customers make use of any accommodation offers integrated into their websites.
The data we gather through these cookies can include which web pages you have viewed, which referring/exit pages you have entered and left from, which platform type you have used, which emails you have opened and acted upon, and date and time stamp information. It also means we can use details about how you’ve interacted with the site or app, such as the number of clicks you make on a given screen, your mouse movements and scrolling activity, the search words you use and the text you enter into various fields.
Marketing cookies
These cookies are used by Booking.com and our trusted partners to gather information about you over time, across multiple websites, applications, or other platforms.
Marketing cookies help us to decide which products, services and interest-based advertisements to show you, both on and off our website and apps.
More specifically, these cookies:
Categorise you into a certain interest profile, for instance, on the basis of the websites you visit and your click behaviour. We use these profiles to display personalised content (such as travel ideas or specific accommodations) on Booking.com and other websites.
Display personalised and interest-based advertisements both on the Booking.com website, our apps and other websites. This is called ‘retargeting’ and is based on your browsing activities, such as the destinations you’ve been searching for, the accommodation you’ve viewed and the prices you’ve been shown. It can also be based on your shopping habits or other online activities. Booking.com uses the services mainly from Criteo B.V., Herengracht 124, 1015 BT Amsterdam, the Netherlands, for individual retargeting ads on the basis of some information collected via our website. Using its algorithms, Criteo analyses surfing behaviour and can then display targeted product recommendations as personalised ad banners on other websites. Criteo's pixel technologies also allow us to evaluate our ad campaigns. You can find more information about Criteo’s technology in
Criteo’s Privacy Policy
.
Retargeting ads can be shown to you both before and after you leave Booking.com, as their purpose is to encourage you to browse or return to our website. You might see these ads on websites, in apps or in emails.
Integrate social media into our website and apps. This allows you to like or share content or products on social media such as Facebook, Instagram, YouTube, Twitter, Pinterest, Snapchat and LinkedIn.
These ‘like’ and ‘share’ buttons work using pieces of code from the individual social media providers, allowing third party cookies to be placed on your device.
These cookies can be purely functional, but they can also be used to keep track of which websites you visit from their network, to build a profile of your online browsing behaviour and to show you personalised ads. This profile will be partly built using comparable information the providers receive from your visits to other websites in their network.
To read more about what social media providers do with your personal data, take a look at their cookie and/or privacy statements:
Facebook
(includes Instagram, Messenger and Audience Network),
Snapchat
,
Pinterest
and
Twitter
. Be aware that these statements may be updated from time to time.
We work with trusted third parties to collect data. We may also sometimes share information with these third parties, such as your email address or phone number. These third parties might link your data to other information they collect to create custom audiences or deliver targeted ads. For information on how these third parties process your data, please take a look at the following links:
How Google uses information
,
Facebook's data policy
.
Non-cookie techniques – email pixels
We may also use techniques, such as pixels, which we don’t mark as cookies because they do not store any information on your device.
We sometimes place pixels in emails, such as newsletters. A ‘pixel’ is an electronic file the size of a single pixel, that is placed in the email and loaded when you open it. By using email pixels, we can see if the message was delivered, if and when you read the message and what you click on.
We also receive this information about the push notifications we send you. These statistics provide us with feedback about your reading behaviour, which we use to optimise our messages and make our communication more relevant to you.
What are your choices?
To learn more about cookies and how to manage or delete them, visit
allaboutcookies.org
or the help section of your browser.
In the settings for browsers like Internet Explorer, Safari, Firefox or Chrome, you can choose which cookies to accept and which to reject. Where you find these settings depends on which browser you use:
Cookie settings in Chrome
Cookie settings in Firefox
Cookie settings in Internet Explorer
Cookie settings in Safari
If you choose to block certain functional cookies, you may not be able to use some features of our services.
In addition to specific settings that we may offer on the Booking.com and apps, you can also opt-out of certain cookies:
Analytics
To prevent Google Analytics from collecting analytical data on certain browser types visit the following link:
Google Analytics Opt-out Browser Add-on
(only available on desktop).
Advertising
We always aim to work with advertising and marketing companies that are members of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI) and/or the Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB).
Members of the NAI and IAB adhere to industry standards and codes of conduct and allow you to opt out of behavioural advertising.
Visit
www.networkadvertising.org
to identify NAI members that may have placed advertising cookies on your computer. To opt out of any NAI member's behavioural advertising programme, just check the box that corresponds to that company.
You may also want to visit
www.youronlinechoices.com
or
www.youradchoices.com
to learn how to opt out of customised ads.
It’s possible that your mobile device allows you to limit information sharing for retargeting purposes through its settings. If you choose to do so, it’s good to be aware that opting out of an online advertising network doesn't mean you’ll no longer see or be subject to online advertising or marketing analysis. It just means that the network you've opted out from will stop delivering ads that are tailored to your web preferences and browsing patterns.
Some websites have ‘Do Not Track’ features that allow you to tell a website not to track you. We’re currently unable to support ‘Do Not Track’ browser settings.
How to contact us
If you have any questions about this cookie statement, please send an email to
dataprotectionoffice@booking.com
.
Our cookie statement may also be updated from time to time. If these updates are substantial, particularly relevant to you or impact your data protection rights, we’ll get in touch with you about them. However, we recommend that you visit this page regularly to stay up to date with any other (less substantial or relevant) updates.
Start of dialog content
How does it work?
1
It starts with a booking
It starts with a booking
The only way to leave a review is to first make a booking. That's how we know our reviews come from real guests who have stayed at the property.
2
Followed by a trip
Followed by a trip
When guests stay at the property they check out how quiet the room is, how friendly the staff are and more.
3
And finally, a review
And finally, a review
After their trip, guests tell us about their stay. We check for naughty words and verify the authenticity of all guest reviews before adding them to our site.
If you booked through us and want to leave a review, please sign in first.
End of dialog content
«
»
Mo
Tu
We
Th
Fr
Sa
Su
Close calendar
Sign in to your account
or use one of these options
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://admin.booking.com/hotel/hoteladmin/privacy.html:
Privacy Statement for Business Partners
Privacy Statement for Booking Holdings Financial Services
Privacy Statement for Business Partners
This privacy statement applies to all Booking.com business partners, including accommodation partners, other trip providers, vendors as well as the employees, contractors or representatives of these parties.
This Privacy Statement explains how the Booking.com group of companies processes personal data concerning individuals, employees, owners, or representatives acting on behalf of our (existing, former, or potential) Business Partners.
In this document, Booking.com group companies may be referred to as ‘we’, ‘us’, ‘our’, or ‘Booking.com’. Individuals, employees, owners or representatives acting on behalf of our Business Partners may be referred to together or separately as ‘you’, ‘your’ or ‘Business Partners’.
Within the context of this Privacy Statement, the term ‘Business Partners’ may refer to:
Trip Providers,
Travel agencies,
Third party vendors,
Ground transportation companies,
Payment service providers,
Other business partners enabling Trip reservations through their websites and/or apps (or other means),
And natural or legal persons maintaining a business relationship with a Booking.com group company.
Please note that companies using our ‘Booking.com for Business’ services to facilitate Trip reservations for their staff are instead subject to our
Privacy and Cookie Statement
for customers.
This Privacy Statement applies to any Booking.com group company responsible for the processing of personal data concerning a Business Partner. Depending on the nature of the business relationship, different Booking.com group companies may be responsible for the processing of that personal data.
For example, Booking.com B.V., located in Amsterdam, the Netherlands, is responsible for the processing of Trip Provider data. This Privacy Statement also applies to Booking Brasil Serviços de Reserva de Hotéis Ltda, located in São Paulo, Brazil, when processing the personal data of accommodation partners in Brazil.
To find out if and to what extent other Booking.com group companies are responsible for the processing of your personal data, please review the information provided below. Information is also provided in your agreement with Booking.com and made available on our online platforms (such as sign up pages or procurement management platforms). Alternatively, you can contact us at
dataprotectionoffice@booking.com
.
For more information about how Booking.com uses cookies on dedicated Business Partner websites and apps, please refer to our
Cookie Statement
.
Terms we use in this Privacy Statement
‘Trip' refers to the various travel products and services that can be ordered, acquired, purchased, bought, paid for, rented, provided to, reserved by, combined by, or consumed by end users, from the Trip Provider.
‘Trip Provider' means the provider of accommodation (e.g. hotel, motel, apartment, bed & breakfast, landlord and generically referred to as ‘accommodation partner’), attractions (e.g. (theme) parks, museums, sightseeing tours), transportation provider (e.g. car rentals, cruises, rail, taxi, airport rides, coach tours, transfers), tour operators, travel insurances and any other travel or related product or service as from time to time available for Trip Reservation on our platforms.
‘Trip Service' means the online purchase, order, (facilitated) payment or reservation service as offered or enabled by Booking.com in respect of various products and services as from time to time made available by Trip Providers on the platform.
‘Trip Reservation' means the order, purchase, payment, booking or reservation of a Trip.
Data collection
The personal data Booking.com collects in regards to Business Partners depends on the context of the business relationship and their interaction with Booking.com, the choices made by the Business Partner and the products, services and features they use.
Please note that the data items in the sections below are only considered ‘personal data’ when concerning a natural person (meaning, an individual human being). These data items are not considered ‘personal data’ when concerning a legal person or entity.
If you are a Business Partner in the state of California, USA, in addition to the information here, you have certain additional rights outlined in the section of our privacy statement
applicable to California
.
The personal data Booking.com collects about our Business Partners can include the following:
Personal data you give to us
Contact details
We collect contact data from our Business Partners, such as first and last name, date of birth (as required), addresses, business email addresses, telephone and fax numbers.
Financial data
We collect data necessary for payment and invoicing purposes (including your bank details, bank account number and VAT number) and data otherwise necessary for the processing of credit slips.
Verification details
Booking.com can ask (representatives of) Business Partners to provide a copy of company registration documents, their ID card or passport, a photo, video or other relevant information to verify the authenticity of the Business Partner. This may also include proof-of-licenses or tax information.
Other data
When a Business Partner communicates with Booking.com, we collect and process information about these communications. During calls with our support centre, live listening may be conducted and calls may be recorded for quality control and training purposes. These recordings may also be used for the handling of claims and fraud detection purposes.
Recordings are kept for a limited amount of time before being automatically deleted, unless Booking.com has a legitimate interest to keep the recording for longer. This only happens in exceptional cases, such as for fraud investigation, compliance and legal purposes.
Information we collect automatically
Depending on the business relationship, Booking.com may also collect information automatically – some of which may be personal data. This data is collected when a Business Partner uses online services such as a registration form, a user account (e.g. for the extranet or partner centre), a vendor management platform, or a Booking.com app, like Pulse.
The data collected may include:
Language settings,
IP address,
Location,
Device settings,
Device operating system,
Log information,
Time of usage,
URL requested,
Status report,
User agent (information about the browser version),
Result (viewer or booker),
Browsing history,
User Booking ID,
Device identifiers such as Android ID, MAC Address, IMEI,
And the type of data viewed.
Personal data you give to us about others
By sharing other individuals’ personal data for business purposes – such as data belonging to your staff members – you confirm that these individuals have been informed about the use of their personal data by Booking.com in accordance with this privacy statement. You also confirm that you have obtained all necessary consent, as required by the laws and regulations applicable to you.
Other information we receive from other sources
Information on insolvencies
In insolvency matters, Booking.com can receive information relating to Business Partners from insolvency administrators, courts or other public authorities.
Data related to law enforcement and tax authority requests
Law enforcement or tax authorities can contact Booking.com with additional information about Business Partners in the event that they are affected by an investigation.
Fraud detection and prevention, risk management and compliance
In certain instances, and as permitted by applicable law, Booking.com may need to collect data through third party sources for fraud detection and prevention, risk management and compliance purposes.
Processing purposes
Booking.com uses the previously described Business Partner information, some of which may be personal data, as relevant, for the following purposes:
A. Registration and administration
Booking.com uses account details, contact details and financial data to manage the business relationship with the Business Partner. This includes for registration and verification purposes.
Certain information, including a Business Partner’s name and address, can be used for other purposes in accordance with the agreement entered into between the Business Partner and Booking.com. An example of this would be using an accommodation partner’s contact details to enable Trip Reservations at their property through a third party website.
B. Customer service
Booking.com uses the information provided by Business Partners (which may include personal data) to provide support services – for example, to respond to requests, questions or concerns from Business Partners or customers.
C. Other activities, including marketing
If a potential Business Partner has not finalised online registration, Booking.com may send a reminder to complete the registration process. We believe that this additional service is useful to our (future) Business Partners because it allows them to complete the registration without having to fill out all registration details again.
Booking.com may invite Business Partners to attend and host events that we think might be relevant or of interest to them. We may also use personal data to offer and host online forums that enable Business Partners to find answers to frequently asked questions about the offering and usage of Booking.com products and services.
As relevant to the business relationship, Booking.com uses personal data for communications, including providing information about system or product updates, sending the Booking.com newsletter, inviting Business Partners to participate in referral programs or competitions (such as Booking Hero) or for other marketing communications. When we use personal data to send direct marketing messages electronically, we will offer appropriate opt-out options.
D. Messaging tools
Booking.com may offer Business Partners different means to communicate with (prospective or existing) guests before or after a reservation.
Business Partners can also contact Booking.com to forward reservation information or questions to guests, or communicate with guests using alias emails, which always include Booking.com as a recipient.
Booking.com may access communications between Business Partners and guests. We also use uses automated systems to review, scan, and analyse communications for the following purposes:
Security,
Fraud prevention,
Compliance with legal and regulatory requirements,
Investigations of potential misconduct,
Product development and improvement,
Research,
Customer engagement ( including to provide guests with information or offers we believe may be of interest to them),
And customer- or technical support.
Communications sent or received using Booking.com communication tools will be received and stored by Booking.com.
E. Analytics, improvement and research:
Booking.com uses information provided to us, which may include personal data, for analytical purposes. This is part of our drive to improve Booking.com products and services and enhance user experience.
This data can also be used for testing purposes, troubleshooting and to improve the functionality and quality of Booking.com’s online services. We also invite Business Partners to participate in surveys and conduct other market research from time to time.
Certain Business Partners may be invited to join a dedicated online platform to interact with Booking.com and/or exchange experiences with other Business Partners.
Please consult the information Booking.com provides when you are invited to participate in a survey, market research, or to join an online platform, to understand how your personal data may be treated differently than described in this Privacy Statement.
F. Security, fraud detection and prevention
We process the information provided to us, which may include personal data, in order to investigate, prevent and detect fraud and other illegal acts. This may be personal data a Business Partner has provided to Booking.com, for example for verification purposes as part of the registration process, personal data collected automatically, or personal data obtained from third party sources (including from guests).
Booking.com may also use personal data to facilitate investigation and enforcement by competent authorities, where necessary. For these purposes, personal data may be shared with law enforcement authorities.
Booking.com can also use personal data for risk assessment and security purposes, including the authentication of users, and we use third-party service providers for third-party risk management. These providers help us to assess the business risk profile of our Business Partners. They may also provide us with third-party due diligence reports, which, as permitted by applicable law, may include possible information about criminal convictions and offenses of owners or Business Partners.
G. Legal and compliance
In certain cases, Booking.com needs to use the information provided (which may include personal data) to handle and resolve legal disputes or for regulatory investigations, risk management and compliance. We may also use it to enforce our agreement(s) with Business Partners or solve a complaint or claim involving a guest, as reasonably expected, and in accordance with internal policies and procedures.
In addition, we may need to share information about Business Partners (including personal data) where required by law or strictly necessary to respond to requests from competent authorities. This includes tax authorities, courts, other governmental and public authorities or local municipalities (e.g. in relation to short-term rental laws).
If we use automated means to process personal data, which produces legal effects or significantly affects you or other natural persons, we will implement suitable measures to safeguard yours or the other person’s rights and freedoms. This includes the right to obtain human intervention.
Legal bases
As applicable for purposes A and B, Booking.com relies on the legal basis that the processing of the personal data is necessary for the performance of the agreement between the Business Partner and Booking.com. If the required information is not provided, Booking.com cannot register a Trip Provider or otherwise work with a Business Partner, nor can we provide customer service.
In view of purposes C to G, Booking.com relies on its legitimate interest to provide its services or obtain services from Business Partners, to prevent fraud and to improve its services. When using personal data to serve Booking.com’s or a third party's legitimate interest, we will always balance the impacted individual’s rights and the protection of their information against Booking.com’s and/or the third party’s rights and interests.
For purposes F and G, Booking.com also relies, where applicable, on compliance with legal obligations (such as lawful law-enforcement requests). Finally, where needed under applicable law, Booking.com will obtain your consent prior to processing personal data, including for marketing purposes or as otherwise required by law.
If you wish to object to the processing set out under C to E and are unable to find a way to opt out directly (for example, in your account settings), please contact
dataprotectionoffice@booking.com
.
California Business Partners, please go to the
California section
of this Privacy Statement for more information about your specific rights and how to exercise those rights.
Data sharing
Sharing with affiliates
In order to support the use of the Booking.com services, your information (which may include personal data) may be shared with members of the Booking.com corporate group. To find out everything you need to know about the Booking.com corporate group, visit our
About Booking.com
page.
Sharing with third parties
We share Business Partners’ information (which may include personal data) with third parties, as permitted by law and as described below:
Service providers (incl. suppliers). We share personal data with selected third-party service providers to provide our products and services, prevent and detect fraud, store data, and otherwise support our business processes, or so they can conduct business on our behalf.
Payment Providers and other financial institutions. To process payments between a Business Partner and Booking.com or a guest and a Business Partner, relevant personal data ,is shared with payment providers and other financial institutions.
Sanction list screening or risk management as required by applicable law.
Compelled disclosure. When legally required, strictly necessary for the performance of our services, in legal proceedings, or to protect our rights or the rights of other members of the Booking Holdings Inc. group or users, we disclose personal data to law enforcement authorities, investigative organisations or other group members.
Sharing and disclosure of aggregated data
We may share information with third parties in an aggregate form and/or other form that does not allow the recipient to identify you, for example for industry analysis or demographic profiling.
Data sharing within the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group
Booking.com is part of the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group. For more information about the group, please visit the
Booking Holdings website
.
Booking.com may receive personal data about Business Partners from other companies in the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group or we may share Business Partners’ personal data with those companies. This is done for the purposes as described below, subject to any contractual terms.
To provide an example of this inter-group collaboration, Booking.com works closely with Rentalcars.com to offer ground transportation services to its customers, either directly or through our Business Partners.
All companies within the Booking Holdings Inc. group may need to exchange Business Partners’ personal data to ensure we protect all users from fraudulent activities on its online platforms.
The purposes for data sharing within the Booking Holdings Inc. group of companies are:
A. To provide services, including reservation services, to manage Business Partner accounts (including vendor management) and to provide support,
B. To prevent, detect and investigate fraudulent and other illegal activities,
C. For analytical and product improvement purposes,
D. To personalise online services or send marketing with the recipient’s consent (or as otherwise permitted by applicable law),
E. To ensure compliance with policies and applicable laws.
Booking.com relies on our legitimate interest and that of the Booking Holdings Inc. group companies’ to receive and share personal data as described under A to D. This is in order to provide services or obtain services from Business Partners, including to improve these services and to prevent fraud.
When using personal data to serve Booking.com’s or a third party's legitimate interest, Booking.com will always balance the impacted individual’s rights and interests in the protection of their personal data with the rights and interests of Booking.com or the third party.
For purpose E, Booking.com relies also, where applicable, on compliance with legal obligations (such as in matters of lawful law-enforcement requests).
If you wish to object to the processing set out under A to D, and are unable to find a way to opt out directly (for example, in your account settings), please contact
dataprotectionoffice@booking.com
.
Data sharing with Booking.com Transport Limited
Booking.com Transport Limited (‘BTL’), also trading as Rentalcars.com, is a private limited liability company, incorporated under the laws of the United Kingdom with offices at 6 Goods Yard Street, Manchester, M3 3BG, United Kingdom.
BTL is part of the Booking Holdings Inc. corporate group, and the ground transportation services offered through Booking.com’s websites and apps are operated by BTL under the Booking.com brand.
Booking.com B.V. operates the BTL
affiliate partner sign-up page
and account management process. The information collected from BTL Business Partners during this sign-up and account management process, which may include personal data, is shared with BTL for the purposes set out in this Privacy Statement.
If you are a BTL Business Partner and have questions or concerns about the processing of your personal data, or you want to exercise the rights you have under this Privacy Statement, please contact BTL at
dataprotectionofficer@rentalcars.com
.
International data transfers
The transmission of Business Partners’ personal data, as described in this Privacy Statement, may include overseas transfer of this data. This may be to countries whose data protection laws are not as comprehensive as those of the country or countries in which you initially provided the information, including within the European Union. In such cases, we will protect your personal data as described in this Privacy Statement.
Where required by European law, we will put appropriate safeguards in place to ensure that such transfers comply with European privacy law. In particular, when personal data is transferred to third-party service providers, we establish and implement appropriate contractual, organisational and technical measures with such providers.
These measures can be established using ‘Standard Contractual Clauses’, approved by the European Commission, by examining the countries data may be transferred to and imposing specific technical and organisational security measures. Where applicable, you can ask us for a copy of these contractual agreements using the
contact details
provided below.
Security
We have procedures in place to prevent unauthorised access to and misuse of personal data.
We use appropriate business systems and procedures to protect and safeguard information, including personal data. We also use security procedures and technical and physical restrictions for accessing and using the personal data on our servers. Only authorised personnel are permitted to access personal data in the course of their work.
Data retention
We will retain personal data for as long as deemed necessary to manage the business relationship with a Business Partner, to provide Booking.com services to a Business Partner and to comply with applicable laws (including those regarding document retention), resolve disputes or claims with any parties, and as otherwise necessary to allow us to conduct our business.
All personal data we retain about you as a Business Partner is subject to this Privacy Statement and our internal retention guidelines. If you have questions about the specific retention periods for the various types of personal data we process, please get in touch using the
contact details below
.
Your choices and rights
Depending on where you are located or the Booking.com entity processing your personal data, different rights may apply to the processing of that data, as set out in this privacy statement. As applicable:
You can ask us for a copy of the personal data we hold about you,
You can inform us of any changes to your personal data, or you can ask us to correct any of the personal data we hold about you,
In certain situations, you can ask us to erase, block or restrict the personal data we hold about you, or object to particular ways in which we are using your personal data,
In certain situations, you can also ask us to send the personal data you have given us to a third party.
Where we are using your personal data on the basis of your consent, you are entitled to withdraw that consent at any time, subject to applicable law. Where we process your personal data based on legitimate interest or public interest, you also have the right to object at any time, subject to applicable law.
Regardless of your location or the Booking.com entity with which you are contracted, we rely on our Business Partners to ensure that the personal data we hold is complete, accurate and current. Please always inform us promptly of any changes to or inaccuracies in your personal data.
If your business has agreements with a different entity to Booking.com B.V. and you would like further information about the relationship between that entity and Booking.com B.V., you can
contact us
at any time. You should also do so if you would like to exercise your rights regarding the personal data processed about you as part of that business relationship.
Contact us
If you have questions, requests or concerns about how we process your personal data, or would like to exercise any of the rights you have under this Privacy Statement, please contact our data protection officer at
dataprotectionoffice@booking.com
. You can also contact your local data protection authority.
We address privacy specific questions, requests and concerns that are reported to us using internal policies and procedures based on applicable privacy laws, regulations and guidance. We revisit and enhance these policies and procedures regularly, also taking into account Business Partner feedback.
Changes to this Privacy Statement
Just as our business is always changing, this Privacy Statement also changes from time to time. If we plan to make material changes or changes that have an impact on you, we will always contact you in advance. An example of this kind of change would be if we were to start processing your personal data for purposes that aren’t detailed above.
Jan 11, 2023
Sub-policy 1
https://www.criteo.com/privacy/:
What does 2025 have in store for retail media? Check out the new “10 Trends” report.
Download the report
Platform
Back
Back
Platform
Advertising & monetization for marketers and media owners
Commerce Media Platform
The connected commerce media environment for the open internet
Commerce Growth
For marketers & agencies looking for automated acquisition & retention
Commerce Max
For brands & agencies looking for retail media on the open internet
Commerce Grid
For media owners, agencies, and retailers looking to connect media and commerce with programmatic
Commerce Yield
For retailers, marketplaces & commerce companies looking to control, scale, and maximize digital asset monetization
Back
Technology
Commerce-focused tech that maximizes outcomes
Addressability
Learn about our multi-pronged addressability strategy for the ecosystem
AI Engine
Removes the guesswork to save time and reach your KPIs
Predictive Bidding
Bids based on the predicted value of each user to save you money
Product Recommendations
Intent-based recommendations that drive more sales
Shopper Graph
Connects shopper IDs & commerce data to scale and optimize your campaigns
Solutions
Back
Back
Performance Media
Digital advertising solutions for every stage of the shopper journey
Customer Acquisition
Reach new people who are likely interested in you but don't know you yet
Customer Retention
Increase customer lifetime value from people who already know you
Dynamic Retargeting
Increase conversions from people who know you with personalized product ads
Audiences
Find and keep your next top customer with the largest commerce dataset
Video Advertising
Drive discovery and engagement with online video
Contextual Advertising
Level up your targeting by combining commerce data and contextual data
Back
Retail Media
Activation & monetization solutions for brands, agencies, and retailers
Retail Media
Reach and convert shoppers with relevant ads near the digital point of sale
Resources
Back
Back
General
Insights, education, Criteo updates, and more
Resource Center
Reports, guides, webinars, and more to inform your ad strategy
Blog
Fresh insights on commerce media and digital advertising
Success Stories
How others have realized their goals by partnering with Criteo
Consumer Trends
The latest consumer data for 20 countries and 600+ product categories
Glossary
Definitions of the most common digital advertising terminology
Addressability
Learn about our multi-pronged addressability strategy for the ecosystem
Help Center
FAQs, guides, and more to help you maximize your Criteo campaigns
Events
See where Criteo will be next
Back
Creative Formats
Ad formats and a gallery of real-world ad examples
Digital Ad Formats
Explore our ad formats for video, adaptive, rich media, and more
Ad Gallery
Real-world examples for a variety of formats, verticals, and regions
Dynamic Creative Optimization+
Real-time creative decisioning that scales to make sure your ads are seen
About
Back
Back
About
Company
Get to know Criteo
Investors
Information for investors
In the News
Press releases and mentions
Diversity, Equity and Inclusion
Our DEI pillars, goals, and more
Sustainability
Our approach for a sustainable future
Product Ethics
How we ensure ethical advertising
Trust Center
Our ad ethics, privacy, and security practices
Careers
Explore open opportunities
Search for:
Search
Select your Language
Deutsch
English
Español
Français
Italiano
Polski
Português
Pусский
한국어
中文
日本語
English
My Account
Contact Sales
Privacy Policy
Table of Contents
Privacy Policy
Disable Criteo services on Internet browsers
Disable Criteo services on mobile applications
How we use your data
How Criteo services work across environments
Your rights
Our partners
CCPA Privacy Policy
Welcome! This is where you can learn about Criteo, the technologies and services we offer to our partners, and our data collection and privacy policies.
Disable Criteo services
Our activity
Criteo helps brands, e-commerce sites and other advertisers (“Advertisers”) promote their products and services. We do that by enabling Advertisers to tailor their campaigns and/or offers to audiences that they want to reach with content that they wish to promote, which in turns means that you may receive advertising that may be of interest to you on the websites, mobile applications and other platforms of our partners (the “Publishers” or “Partners”).
How do our services work?
Criteo does not use any data that allows us to identify you directly, such as your first and last name, postal address, email address in plain text, etc.
When you browse an Advertiser’s website or mobile application that uses our technologies, that technology allows us to collect a limited amount of data relating to your browsing, such as the products you have viewed, put in your shopping cart and purchased.
Find out more about the type of data collected by Criteo
. This navigation data is linked to a unique identifier, namely an identification cookie or any other similar technology (such as mobile advertising identifiers and non-cookie technologies) depending on your navigation environment.
When you browse a Publisher’s website or mobile application that also uses our technologies, the Publisher notifies us, either directly or through an advertiser exchange, that an advertising space is available to offer you personalized advertising. The Criteo technology, working with our Advertisers, then may decide to purchase that advertising space.
The advertising you see from our partners when using our technology is based on our recommendation algorithms.
Practical example
Here is one way our technology allows us to provide you with ads that may be of interest to you:
When users visit an Advertiser website using our technologies, data relating to their browsing events are collected.
Example of data collected by Criteo:
The user with the cookie identifier 123f94d8-a745-4f8b-a1d0-bf6fbbd60058 (let’s name it “Criteo ID 123” for convenience) viewed product A on 01/01/2018 at 13:37 while browsing www.example-advertiser.com.
Our technologies compare these data with the aggregated data available on the Advertiser’s website.
Example of aggregated data available:
In general, users who purchased Product A on www.example-advertiser.com also purchased Product B on this website
In general, Product C is popular on this website
When users browse a Publisher website, we are informed of the availability of advertising spaces.
Example of data collected by Criteo:
An advertising space with the following characteristics (size, visibility, etc.) is available on www.example-publisher.com that the Criteo ID 123 is about to browse
Then our algorithms determine the relevance for buying the advertising space and displaying a personalized ad on it.
Example of decision that would be taken by Criteo: Buy the advertising space available on www.example-publisher.com and display an ad featuring the following products:
Product A, because the user with the Criteo ID 123 showed interest in it during a recent session
Product B, because the user with the Criteo ID 123 is likely to be interested in this product since he/she has viewed product A during a recent session
Product C, because this product is popular.
If you disable Criteo services, we will not display any personalized ads to you. On the other hand, the advertising space may be purchased by another company to display personalized or non-personalized ads. If you want to disable Criteo services,
click here
.
Please note that the use of our technologies on our partners’ websites and mobile applications is governed by their privacy policies, which can be accessed directly from their websites and/or mobile applications. We require them to provide you with complete and appropriate information and, to the extent required by law, to obtain your consent before any of your personal information is available to us.
Our technologies are able to work in a similar fashion:
on a webpage by relying on cookies, which are supported by most web browsers;
on a mobile application by relying on the mobile advertising ID provided by mobile operating system vendors (e. g. Google and Apple);
on an browser which default settings limit the use of third-party cookies and inter-site tracking, such as Safari, if you provide consent for our services to co-exist with these default settings;
and in a transversal way between the different environments listed above. Find out more about
how our services work from one environment to another (“cross-device linking”)
.
In order to provide you with ads that are better tailored to your interests, we may receive and process audience and segments information derived from the data you accepted to share with trusted third party partners. These partners may send us information regarding your shopping habits (e.g. interested in clothing, furniture or electronics), the points of interest that are near you based on non-precise geolocation information (e.g. stores that are geographically close to you) or the products you have been purchasing in a brick and mortar store of the advertisers that are using our services to manage their online marketing campaigns. In such case, Criteo will only process geolocation information and identifiers (such as cookie IDs and Mobile Advertising IDs) that do not allow us to know who you are.
We believe that the personalization of ads is beneficial to you and the Internet ecosystem in that it contributes to the promotion of a free and open Internet by allowing Publishers to monetize the content they create, while allowing you to benefit from ads that may be more interesting to you than non-personalized ads that would be displayed to you.
Our privacy pillars
We have developed our services and technologies taking great care to respect your privacy.
Data minimisation
We undertake never to use any data that allows us to identify you directly, such as your first and last name, postal address, email address in plain text, etc. Without ever being able to identify you personally, our technologies are able to recognize your devices and/or browsers on the basis of an identifier consisting of a series of characters (identifier contained in a cookie or other). However, these data are qualified as personal data by European regulations and personal information by Californian law. As such, they are the subject of our greatest vigilance in terms of security and respect for your privacy.
Privacy by design
Our product teams develop every feature with privacy in mind; it’s the cornerstone of Privacy by Design, Criteo’s long-standing practice and commitment to ensuring industry-leading privacy, security and safety for consumers and marketers.
Key elements include:
As required by the GDPR, we have had a designated Data Privacy Officer since 2013 along with a team of privacy experts.
These experts sit within the Product and R&D organization. They perform ongoing Privacy Impact Assessments to monitor potential risks during the product lifecycle and proactively mitigate those risks.
The Data Privacy team delivers company-wide privacy training, enforces codes of conduct, and is integral to ensuring that we build best-in-class products and services.
We regularly review and document our internal policies, amend existing privacy policies as necessary, and enforce these policies with our partners and vendors.
Criteo's commitments
Our ads do not require:
To collect data that allows us to identify you directly, such as your first and last name, your postal address, or your email address in plain text.
To collect sensitive information (such as religion, political opinion, health or sexual orientation …) to create segments or target ads to users. For the sole purpose of serving ads on a Publisher’s properties that could possibly reveal sensitive information (eg. a medical website), we may collect the URL of the website or the name of the mobile application.
To collect irrevocable identifiers, such as the hardware identifiers of the devices you use (UDID or MAC address, etc.).
To collect data related to your precise geolocation in real time.
Criteo supports industry initiatives for greater transparency in personalized advertising
Criteo has been involved from an early stage in initiatives to promote greater transparency and user control over personalized advertising.
Digital Advertising Alliance
Criteo complies with the
Digital Advertising Alliance’s (DAA) self-regulatory principles for online behavioural advertising
and is integrated on the
DAA’s “YourAdChoices” unsubscription platform
, which gives you the opportunity to express your online advertising choices to all its participants, including your desire to disable their services.
European Digital Advertising Alliance
Criteo complies with the
self-regulatory principles of the European Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA)
. The Criteo Dynamic Retargeting service has been independently certified by the EDAA for data protection.
Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada
Criteo respects the
self-regulatory principles of the Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)
and is present on the
DAAC’s unsubscribe platform “YourOnlineChoices”
, which offers you the opportunity to express your choices regarding online advertising to all its stakeholders, and in particular your desire to disable their services.
Network Advertising Initiative
Criteo adheres to the
codes of conduct of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI)
and is integrated with the
NAI unsubscription platform
, which offers you the opportunity to express your choices regarding online advertising to all the players involved, and in particular your desire to disable their services.
IAB Europe
Criteo participates in the
IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework
and complies with its Specifications and Policies. Criteo’s identification number within the framework is 91.
Criteo imposes a high level of requirements on its partners
We contractually require that the Advertisers and Publishers with whom we work to comply with the
Criteo Advertising Guidelines
and
Supply Partner Guidelines
, as well as with the various regulations applicable to the protection of personal data, and in particular the GDPR.
By using the Criteo Services, they undertake, where the applicable regulations require it:
to include on their websites and mobile applications the appropriate notice and information, allowing users to know more about our services and to object to them through this notice; and
to collect the consent of users prior to the placement of cookies or any similar technology for the purpose of displaying personalized advertisements.
In order to help our partners meet their legal and contractual obligations, we regularly share industry best practices with them.
Google’s Privacy Sandbox
We participate in testing the Google Privacy Sandbox, a set of technologies to enable digital advertising without using third-party cookies in Google Chrome. With your consent, and as part of the testing, Criteo may store and access data on your device or browser, including by setting new cookies, that
relates to your web browsing interests and to ad measurement. In accordance with applicable data protection laws, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time on this
page
. For more information about the Google Privacy Sandbox please see
https://privacysandbox.com/
.
Your data, your choice
Understand my rights
in relation to my personal data.
Learn more about
how we use your data
.
Disable Criteo services
.
Contact us
.
Changes to our privacy policy
Please note that we may update or change this privacy policy. If we revise our privacy policy, we will post those changes to this privacy statement, and to other places we deem appropriate, so that you are aware of what information we collect, how we use it, and under what circumstances, if any we disclose it. If we make any material changes we will notify you by means of a notice on this site prior to the change becoming effective.
Last updated : 11/03/2022
Criteo Trend Tracker
Data & Insights to Know and Share